,Unnamed: 0,location,job_title,job_desc
0,0,Houston,underwriter,"The Commercial Real Estate (CRE) group at J.P. Morgan prides itself on leveraging its industry knowledge to offer best-in-class financial solutions across all major real estate asset types: multifamily, retail, office and industrial properties. We work with national and regional clients across the entire real estate sector, including developers, investors, owners, operating companies, investment funds, real estate investment trusts, and non-profit organizations.
Real Estate Banking:
Real Estate Banking (REB) delivers commercial real estate and banking products to top-tier clients active in major markets across the U.S. Primary property types include multifamily, retail, office and industrial properties. REB clients are top-tier national and regional real estate developers, investors, Real Estate Operating Companies (REOCs) and opportunity and investment funds.
REB has broad national capabilities and expertise in real estate credit, including:

Commercial and multifamily construction
Acquisitions
Structured revolving facilities
Term mortgage lending
Subscription facilities

The business also often assembles and manages large multi-bank syndications to finance institutional quality real estate investments for clients at both the asset and entity level.
The position is for a contributing member of the deal team who will be responsible for the underwriting and management of a portfolio of commercial real estate credits/relationships in a fast-paced, regulated environment. The Credit Associate will also be involved in the loan closing process and construction loan draw approvals. Candidates should have a good baseline knowledge of credit and commercial real estate finance/lending with the expectation of developing these skills further while in this role. Strong analytical and business writing skills are necessary. The role will have some customer contact so candidates should have solid communication skills.
Responsibilities include

Performing necessary credit analysis and due diligence on new loan opportunities including assisting in preparing Investment Committee Memorandums
Working with Product Specialists to size and structure loans to mitigate risks
Performing final underwriting of loans and Risk Rating recommendations
Preparing Credit Approval Packages and recommending approvals to Senior Credit Executives
Working with loan administration and Product Specialists to facilitate loan closings
Working with Portfolio Management to ensure credit worthiness of Borrowers/Guarantors/Sponsors and appropriate risk grades are assigned
Ensuring compliance with established underwriting standards and guidelines, credit approval requirements, and other policies and procedures associated with new loan originations
Communicating with clients on loan due diligence deliverables
Qualifications:

3+ years of Commercial Real Estate Credit and/or Commercial Banking/lending experience
BA/BBA required
Strong analytical and business writing skills
Good interpersonal skills with internal partners, counsel, clients and senior management.
Accounting and finance knowledge, as well as knowledge of real estate fundamentals and concepts
Strong experience in Microsoft Office required and Argus a plus
Experience with cash flow modeling and financial statement analysis is preferred
Knowledge of JPMC or similar bank policies and procedures preferred
Completion of a major corporate banking credit training program (or the equivalent corporate banking/corporate finance experience)
JPMorgan Chase & Co., one of the oldest financial institutions, offers innovative financial solutions to millions of consumers, small businesses and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under the J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Our history spans over 200 years and today we are a leader in investment banking, consumer and small business banking, commercial banking, financial transaction processing and asset management.
We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans"
1,1,Houston,underwriter,"To review the credit analysis and underwriting of Credit Union Loans. This includes working with staff and members directly to utilize member information to assess loan requests and make recommendations that best meet member needs.
Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities
Consistently meet all Shell FCU Service Commitments; Shell FCU Employee Creed and Shell FCU Service Distinctions.
Accountable to maintain knowledge of and comply with all applicable rules and regulations required within the scope of duties, including, but not limited to, the Bank Secrecy Act.
Required to attend annual training sessions as instructed or scheduled.
Perform job duties and responsibilities in compliance to SFCU policies, procedures, philosophy and standards of performance.
Propose/implement policies and update guidelines and procedures for each loan program to ensure compliance with regulations and secondary market guidelines.
Ensure staff is knowledgeable about credit union products and services.
Help coordinate loan promotions between Lending Department and Marketing Department.
Underwrite loans and make decisions in the best interest of the credit union following current policies and procedures.
Answer questions and phone calls from Loan Officers/FSR’s.
Resolve member issues involving loan decisions and/or account errors to ensure member satisfaction.
Develop and/or schedule training as needed/including Friday Lending meetings with power points
Determine work procedures and implement to expedite work flow.
Taking Home Equity applications, processing files and preparing documents to get to Loan Officers/FSR’s for signing.
Filing Deed of Trust and Designation of Homestead at courthouse, setting up maintenance on core system and contacting insurance company for verification of coverage.
Processing and preparing documents for Unimproved Property loans, ordering appraisals and Title Policy, coordinating closings and setting maintenance in core system.
Monthly review of Line of Credit renewal report.
Track Warranty and GAP productivity at main branch.
Verify, print and update rates, addendums and other disclosures as needed.
Provide one-on-one training or group discussions for Loan Officers/FSR’s regarding processes or procedures.
MLO registration and Home Equity training.
Signing off on monthly bills.
Maintaining and ordering office supplies.
Request login for new users and maintenance on Carfax, Auto Exam and Visual GAP, Equifax, TU and VTR.
Set up new users in Loan Origination system.
HMDA maintenance and submission.
Authorize release of collateral on existing loans, change in loan terms, payment extensions, etc.
Coordinate with Collections Department regarding work-out loans. Get approval from VP of Lending/CLO on rate exceptions.
Log for daily loan totals.
Maintains monthly loan totals and sends Lending Distribution email.
Maintains Disaster Recovery vendor lists.
Quick Tip emails for LO system and Lending.
Core system/LO testing for upgrades and enhancements.
Maintains updates to Intranet for Lending.
Coach, Train, Mentor Lending staff to ensure proper procedures are complete.
Assist Lending staff for loan structure, proper product and applicable guidelines.
Performs additional duties as assigned.
Shell Federal Credit Union is an equal opportunity and an affirmative action employer and committed to providing equal opportunity for all employees and applicants for employment, without regard to race, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, citizenship status, marital status, protected veteran status, mental and/or physical disability, pregnancy, or any basis prohibited by State or Federal law.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
 Knowledge and Skills
Experience:
Two years to five years of similar or related experience.
Education / Training:
High school diploma or general education degree (GED). A four-year college degree or completion of a specialized course of study at a business or trade school preferred.
Job Requirements:
Knowledge of credit union products and services
Welcoming and helpful demeanor
Must possess professional verbal communication skills
Possess the desire to accept additional responsibilities within branch operations
Possess well-developed communication skills using tact and persuasiveness to reach an objective and maintain goodwill
Possess a highly positive, member-service oriented attitude and the ability to anticipate member needs and initiate assistance beyond duties assigned
Physical Demands:
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to bend and stand. May at times be able to lift, carry and/or move up to 15 pounds.
Working Conditions
Exposure to potential hazardous conditions-robbery. Employees are to receive detailed instructions and procedures to be followed to minimize risk.
In accordance with the American with Disabilities Act, it is possible that requirements may be modified to reasonably accommodate disabled individuals. However, no accommodations will be made which may pose serious health or safety risks to the employee or others or which impose undue hardships on the organization.
This Job Description is not a complete statement of all duties and responsibilities comprising this position. Job descriptions are not intended and do not create employment contracts. The organization maintains its status as an at-will employer. Employees can be terminated for any reason not prohibited by law."
3,3,Houston,underwriter,"Zurich is currently hiring an Underwriting Account Service Associate to join the Underwriting team!

As an Underwriting Account Service Associate you will support the Large Energy Casualty team. Exceptional organizational and multi-tasking abilities are required in this position. This position will be located at our Houston, TX office.

Underwriting Account Service Associates are charged with a variety of tasks including:
Working collaboratively with assigned underwriters.
Communicating directly with both internal and external customers via phone and email.
Issuing new policies, renewals, endorsements and handling billing and other service type issues.

Required:
Bachelors degree and no prior experience in the Administrative, Customer Service, Financial Services, Risk Management or Insurance area
 OR
Zurich Certified Insurance Apprentice, including Associate Degree and no prior experience in the Administrative, Customer Service, Financial Services, Risk Management or Insurance area
 OR
High School Diploma or Equivalent and 2 or more years of experience in the Administrative, Customer Service, Financial Services, Risk Management or Insurance area
 AND
Knowledge of data collection and analysisMicrosoft Office experience

Preferred:
Insurance industry knowledgeKnowledge of processing, rating and policy management systems used in the insurance industryStrong verbal and written communication skillsCustomer service experienceDetail orientedMulti-tasking skills


A future with Zurich

Now is the time to move forward and make a difference. At Zurich, we want you to share your unique perspectives, experiences and ideas so we can grow and drive sustainable change together. As part of a leading global organization, Zurich North America has over 148 years of experience managing risk and supporting resilience. Today, Zurich North America is a leading provider of commercial property-casualty insurance solutions and a wide range of risk management products and services for businesses and individuals. We serve more than 25 industries, from agriculture to technology, and we insure 90% of the Fortune 500®. Our growth strategy is not limited to our business. As an employer, we strive to provide ongoing career development opportunities, and we foster an environment where voices are diverse, behaviors are inclusive, actions drive equity, and our people feel a sense of belonging. Be a part of the next evolution of the insurance industry. Join us in building a brighter future for our colleagues, our customers and the communities we serve. Zurich maintains a comprehensive employee benefits package for employees as well as eligible dependents and competitive compensation. Please click here to learn more.

As a global company, Zurich recognizes the diversity of our workforce as an asset. We recruit talented people from a variety of backgrounds with unique perspectives that are truly welcome here. Taken together, diversity and inclusion bring us closer to our common goal: exceeding our customers’ expectations. Zurich does not discriminate on the basis of age, race, ethnicity, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender expression, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other legally protected status. EOE disability/vet

Zurich does not accept unsolicited resumes from search firms or employment agencies. Any unsolicited resume will become the property of Zurich American Insurance. If you are a preferred vendor, please use our Recruiting Agency Portal for resume submission.

Location(s): AM - Houston
Remote Working: No
Schedule: Full Time"
4,4,Houston,underwriter,":

Responsibilities:
Service a book of business under the direct supervision of an underwriter
Log applications, prepare binders, and process policies and endorsements
Bind risk, post the invoice and process technical data
Screen renewal applications and send out renewal letters; perform some of the underwriting and prepare quotes for underwriter approval
Assist with new business development
Order and follow up on inspections and handle endorsement requests and referrals for the underwriter
Manage relationships with retail agents and follow up on any outstanding information needed to complete the underwriting file

Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent combination of education and work experience
Insurance experience in underwriting and/or brokerage support with excess & surplus lines preferred
Sales & marketing experience preferred
Be technologically savvy and data driven
Compensation Package:
Competitive base compensation
Health benefits & 401K with employer match
Employer paid continuing education courses and designations
Many opportunities for career advancement

About Our Company:

Founded in 1905, R.B. Jones is a leader in providing specialty risk coverage solutions to brokers, agents and wholesalers, including: Commercial Marine, Excess Energy, Commercial Property, Professional Liability, Specialty General Liability, Commercial Umbrella/Excess Liability and other unique products. RB Jones Marine is a distinct business unit exclusively focused on Commercial Marine and Excess Energy. The team of specialty insurance experts delivers comprehensive solutions, including: Marine Liability, Cargo, Hull and Machinery, and Energy Liability.
Equal Opportunity Employer
The H.W. Kaufman Group of companies is an equal opportunity employer. All employment decisions are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation, genetic information or any other status or condition protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate."
6,6,Houston,underwriter,"Overview:

This position supports the commercial lending team by underwriting at an advanced level of complexity for commercial portfolios. Provides guidance to structuring, servicing, and analysis for both new and renewal credits. Identifies, gathers, and reviews financial information to determine borrower risk ratings and appropriate loan structuring. Assesses and communicates risks to assist department risk mitigation strategies. Provides service and support for both associates and clients, participating in client calls, and may assist in identifying cross-sales opportunities. May assist special projects as needed to facilitate commercial lending activities and service capabilities, and may provide direction to less experienced underwriters in the work group.
This Underwriter has an option to be seated in multiple cities - in Texas, Arizona, Missouri, Oregon, Washington, California, Oklahoma or Colorado.
Responsibilities:
Underwriting - Underwrites commercial credit actions according to applicable regulations, procedures, and guidelines. Reviews financial statements, communicates with clients or prospects, and performs analysis to recommend borrower risk ratings and appropriate loan structuring. Ensures all involved parties are updated on underwriting progress and outcome. May provide guidance to less experienced underwriters through knowledge of underwriting procedures and information needs.
Analysis - Sources, compiles, and interprets financial data to support structuring and approval of loans. Reviews industry information and comparisons, key risks and mitigants, and collateral to form a general business overview of the borrower. Utilizes results of analysis to underwrite commercial loans.
Risk Management - Identifies risks through reviews, analysis, and research of new and existing commercial credit requests and relationships. Works closely with Bank associates and partners to resolve risk issues, communicating review schedule and potential changes in the commercial portfolio. Assists in coordinating review and renewal schedules for existing credits, facilitating ongoing risk identification and management.
Business Support - May assist in Identifying cross-sales opportunities for new and existing relationships based on analysis activities. Identifies servicing information and prepares credit analysis documentation. Partners with associates and clients to determine needs and structuring of new requests, renewals, and modifications, participating in client and prospect calls as needed. May assist management with peer development and training.
Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree with 4 years of experience in Commercial Lending, Commercial Credit Analysis, Financial Statement Spreading and projections.
OR
High School Diploma/GED with 8 years of experience with 6 years of experience in Commercial Lending, Commercial Credit Analysis, Financial Statement Spreading and projections."
8,8,Houston,underwriter,"Commercial Underwriter II
Responsible for the underwriting and documentation of moderately complex loan requests for assigned LOBs (Lines of Business). Owns deal analyses and executes workflow according to established SLAs (Service Level Agreements). Assists in the on-going monitoring of the credit exposure for assigned relationships, including renewals, reaffirmations and annual risk ratings.

Reporting Information
The Commercial Underwriter reports to the Manager Commercial Underwriting (MCU).

Position Competencies
Successful incumbents possess strong analytical, time management, verbal and written communication skills, are accountable and have strong data management capabilities.

Position Responsibilities:
Provide complete analysis of loan package for new deals, reviews and renewals.
Prepares and/or updates appropriate RECAP documentation with guidance from MCU (Manager Credit Underwriting).
Prepares basic collateral charts, cash flows, risk ratings and other attachments.
Provides basic industry analysis.
Identifies policy exceptions and works with MCU/RM (Relationship Manager) to mitigate them.
Identifies and analyzes inconsistencies and inaccuracies in customer data, including spreads, aging's, projections and other financial documents.
Develops basic analytical narrative and commentary on the request.
Evaluates strengths and weaknesses of the credit and escalates risks and other issues to MCU and/or RM or PM (Portfolio Manager).
Assists RM/PM with contacting customers to obtain answers for loan analyses and recommend loan structures and covenants.
Prepares risk rating with guidance from MCU.
Administration
Monitors loan covenants and tracking on simple transactions in conjunction with CSC (Credit Support Center) support team for assigned relationships.
Shares responsibility with Credit Specialists for performing OFAC checks and identifying issues.
Investigates title searches, surveys and UCC (Uniform Commercial Code) searches as requested by MCU or RM/PM.
Process Sustainability
Adheres to department procedures for workload management.
Strives to meet or exceed SLA, or when not possible, communicate to MCU and RM/PM.
Ensures appropriate RECAP formats/attachments are used in accordance with approved process and procedures.
Other duties as assigned.
Work Schedule
This position's work schedule may require overtime.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Business, Economics or similar degree field. Minimum two Accounting courses (6 units)
1 year of experience commercial underwriting, credit and/or lending experience
Completion of Comerica's Credit College or other formal credit training
1 year of experience with Microsoft Office Applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook)
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Business, Economics or similar degree field. Minimum two Accounting courses (6 units) with 3.0 overall GPA and 3.0 in Accounting courses
1 year of experience commercial underwriting, credit and/or lending experience
Completion of Comerica's Credit College or other formal credit training
1 year of experience with Microsoft Office Applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook)
2 Riverway
8:00am - 5:00pm Monday - Friday"
9,9,Houston,underwriter,"Who we are
American International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading global insurance organization. Building on 100 years of experience, today AIG member companies provide a wide range of property casualty insurance, life insurance, retirement solutions, and other financial services to customers in more than 80 countries and jurisdictions. These diverse offerings include products and services that help businesses and individuals protect their assets, manage risks and provide for retirement security.
Get to know the business
General Insurance is a leading provider of insurance products and services for commercial and personal insurance customers. It includes one of the world’s most far-reaching property casualty networks. General Insurance offers a broad range of products to customers througha diversified, multichannel distribution network.
AIG’s underwriters develop insurance solutions that address the exposures of companies and individuals, and embody AIG’s tradition of innovation, bringing to market ground-breaking insurance solutions for our changing world. AIG’s underwriters help to find insurance solutions for risks from a range of areas including life insurance, commercial property and business interruption, aviation, financial lines, casualty, environmental, catastrophic events, high net worth individuals, and boardroom liabilities.
AIG has an exciting opportunity to join the Property underwriting support team and assist the Wholesale Property field underwriters.
You will contribute to the growth and profitability of the Wholesale Property unit by providing underwriting and administration support to allocated underwriters as well as the global property underwriting community. Ensure exceptional customer service to both internal and external parties and consistently meet service levels and performance targets in terms of volume, accuracy, and quality. This role reports to a cross regional Underwriting Analyst Manager within Property Operations.
About the role
What you need to know:
Partner with regional underwriters for end-to-end processing of new and renewal business.
Works closely with field underwriters and CoE partners to develop and deliver tailored solutions.
Work with allocated underwriters to set-up systems and underwriting platforms.
Review location data and CAT modeling results are reported accurately.
Preform data analytics, remodeling when necessary, referral documentation preparation and completion, as well as form checklist and working approval.
Quote, binder/slip, policy, and endorsement preparation and issuance.
Participate in post-binding and servicing activities.
Complete all delegated projects in the manner expected and requested by the Manager.
What we’re looking for:
Bachelor’s degree preferred or equivalent work experience.
Prioritizing – able to navigate and switch between multiple proprietary, vendor, web-based and standard computer systems.
Microsoft Office – proficiency in Excel, Word, and Power point
Learning Agility – willingness to learn from experiences and new situations.
Client Servicing – ability to anticipate client (internal and external) needs and act proactively.
Problem Solving – identify problems and solutions matched to the appropriate solutions.
Attention to Detail – demonstrate attention to detail to ensure accurate documentation is maintained.
A look at our benefits
At AIG, we have a 100-year legacy of working to make the world a better place. And that begins with our employees. We’re proud to offer a range of employee benefits and resources that help you protect what matters most – your health care, savings, financial protection, and wellbeing. We provide a variety of leaves for personal, health, family, and military needs. For example, the “Giving Back” program allows you to take up to 16 hours a year to volunteer in your community.
We also believe in fostering our employees’ development and offer a range of learning opportunities for employees to hone their professional skills to position themselves for the next steps of their careers. AIG also has a tuition reimbursement program for eligible employees to enhance their education, skills, and knowledge in areas that relate to their current position or future positions to which they may transfer or progress.
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer
It has been and will continue to be the policy of American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories. At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.
It has been and will continue to be the policy of American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories.
At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.
To learn more please visit: https://www.aig.com/about-us/diversity-equity-and-inclusion
AIG is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to job applicants and employees with physical or mental disabilities. If you believe you need a reasonable accommodation in order to search for a job opening or to complete any part of the application or hiring process, please send an email to candidatecare@aig.com . Reasonable accommodations will be determined on a case-by-case basis.
Functional Area:
UW - Underwriting
Estimated Travel Percentage (%): No Travel
Relocation Provided: No
Lexington Specialty Insurance Agency, Inc."
10,10,Houston,underwriter,"Liberty Mutual Surety™ is currently recruiting for a Contract Surety Underwriter to join our Field Contract team in Houston, TX.
As a Surety Underwriter you will market, underwrite, and service independent agents, brokers, and Contract surety accounts within an assigned territory. Using your excellent rapport building skills, you will build and maintain positive relationships and will market to your territory focusing on relationship building rather than transactional sales. You will also use your business and financial acumen to perform primary credit underwriting and financial/risk analysis, provide recommendations, and make decisions on new and existing accounts. This is an excellent opportunity for an experienced and self-motivated surety professional looking to grow their career with a top surety company that focuses on its employees and customers first.
Liberty Mutual Surety, a business unit of Liberty Mutual Insurance, is the #1 Surety in the United States and the largest globally. Conducting business worldwide through fronting relationships and Liberty-owned subsidiaries, we provide bonds in over 60 countries for construction firms, manufacturers and suppliers, and commercial enterprises on an account and transactional basis. We are committed to building mutually profitable relationships by providing smart business solutions, ease of doing business, and consistent, responsive service. Liberty Mutual Surety is dedicated to the communities we serve and highly values a diverse workforce in more than 16 countries
Responsibilities:
Meets with agents and brokers from assigned customer base/territory to solicit business/submissions via marketing efforts and educate agency representative(s) on Liberty Mutual Surety policies, procedures, appetite, and requirements. Act in a consultative capacity and discuss/review agency accounts and performance.
Underwrites new and existing account submissions utilizing underwriting authority granted by Chief Underwriting Officer. May handle most complex accounts based on level of role. Makes thorough evaluations and assessments of a customer's financial, technical, organizational, and management capacities, past experience, desired objectives as well as a subjective judgment of character, normally based upon data/insights. In many cases, will meet with client to facilitate above assessments.
Performs analytical evaluations of financial statements on both a static and trend basis. Determines the present and historical financial position of the account and monitors financial position of risk through analysis of quarterly statements and work in progress data as appropriate
Develop/maintain strong relationships with agents/brokers and oversee a book of Contract business within a defined territory. Meets production, marketing, and profitability goals as set by manager and assist in developing marketing plan.
Stay abreast of Liberty Mutual Surety product lines and identify cross-selling opportunities with agent, engaging/referring appropriate parties as necessary.
Responsible for investigation, analyzing, and managing all necessary underwriting/accounting/workflow issues, within framework of Surety policies and procedures.
Monitor an existing book of business from an underwriting standpoint. Continuously evaluates the qualitative characteristics of the business (new and existing) as assigned. Examples include utilization of self-audit programs, financial ratio analysis report. Makes recommendations to Manager for proper lines of authority to be submitted to Home Office. Monitors and controls utilization of such lines to ensure compliance with guidelines.
May assess and identify changes in all aspects of the business including, but not limited to, work program to financial strength criteria, nature of work performed (inherent risk), accuracy and timeliness of data flow, and exposure analyses. Coordinate and surface issues to more Home Office staff and Bond Managers
Assists in the evaluation of business continuity arrangements and funding mechanisms (such as adequacy of life insurance) to preclude financial drain of customer in the event of the demise of (an) owner or other insurable loss.
In connection with credit recommendations which tend to fall outside of normal underwriting standards, applies sound reason and business logic to reach decision as authorized. Effectively documents such logic in file and communicates to more senior Home Office and Field underwriting staff, as necessary.
Provide direction for topics to be addressed in meetings with agents, customers and others, as necessary.
Prepare and implement instructions for administering workflows and accounting/billing issues to service unique situations.
May mentor more junior staff based on level.
Performs special projects and other duties as assigned.
BA/BS in Business Administration or related field typically required.
A minimum of 5 years' experience expected, typically 7 or more years surety underwriting experience and/or equivalent surety related business experience preferred.
Proven analytical ability to evaluate and judge underwriting risks within scope of responsibility.
Demonstrated ability to communicate complex analyses and information in understandable written and/or oral directives to other persons in the organization for underwriting or training purposes.
Demonstrated effective communication and interpersonal skills in dealing with agents, brokers, CPAs, bankers, attorneys, etc. required.
Must demonstrate comprehension of complex technical underwriting issues and be capable of defining and implementing necessary underwriting and administrative processes/ workflows to properly manage or administer those issues.
Demonstrated track record of business development.
At Liberty Mutual, our purpose is to help people embrace today and confidently pursue tomorrow. That's why we provide an environment focused on openness, inclusion, trust and respect. Here, you'll discover our expansive range of roles, and a workplace where we aim to help turn your passion into a rewarding profession.
Liberty Mutual has proudly been recognized as a “Great Place to Work” by Great Place to Work® US for the past several years. We were also selected as one of the “100 Best Places to Work in IT” on IDG's Insider Pro and Computerworld's 2020 list. For many years running, we have been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Employers for Women and one of America's Best Employers for New Graduates—as well as one of America's Best Employers for Diversity. To learn more about our commitment to diversity and inclusion please visit: https://jobs.libertymutualgroup.com/diversity-inclusion
We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to make things better, and we put people first by offering you benefits that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/Benefits
Liberty Mutual is an equal opportunity employer. We will not tolerate discrimination on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, age, disability, veteran's status, pregnancy, genetic information or on any basis prohibited by federal, state or local law.

Bachelor's Degree

16"
12,12,Houston,underwriter,"Job Description:

THE OPPORTUNITY:
Access the breadth of our products and markets
Use cutting-edge technology to deliver high quality service to agents and agencies
Be responsible for ensuring the correct technical data on a risk is input into ConceptOne.
Binding risk, posting the invoice and processing technical data into ConceptOne as well as other on-line formats.
Follow up for any outstanding information needed to complete the underwriting file.
Order and follow up on inspections and referral to the underwriter as necessary.
Some initial review of the inspection will be done.
Handle endorsement requests and referral to the underwriter as necessary
Screen renewals and send out renewal letters. Screen renewal applications, performing some of the underwriting on these and prepare the quotes for underwriter approval.
Respond to underwriter for support and assistance
Miscellaneous filing on a day to day basis
Complete project work as assigned by underwriter
Manage relationships with retail agents
Maintain quality of end product verifying prepared documents follow established procedures
Have knowledge of and perform computer data entry of quotations, binders and related support documents
Respond to requests for coverage on a timely basis
Work closely with companies to write new and renew business.

QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent combination of education and experience
Insurance experience in underwriting with excess and surplus lines preferred
Insurance license preferred
Be technologically savvy and data driven

COMPENSATION PACKAGE:
Competitive base compensation
Health benefits & 401K with employer match
Employer paid continuing education courses and designations
Many opportunities for career advancement"
14,14,Houston,underwriter,"Our well established client has an immediate need for a Life Insurance Associate. Essential Functions/Major Duties: General underwriting case managementProvide regular case status updates to the Client Relationship Managers (CRMs) and Project Managers (PMs)Ensure that status updates are emailed to clients and advisors either directly or through the CRMs and PMs regularlyConfirm that agent is contracted, licensed, and appointedConduct 15-30-minute telephone interviews with clients or advisors to collect their personal, financial, medical, and avocation historySchedule medical exams, send reminders and follow up to ensure successful completionCoordinate ordering of APS records and review records upon receipt to assess medical historyNegotiate with carrier underwriters for best possible risk classification and elimination of additional requirementsUnderstand how final offers will impact the case design and work cooperatively with design analysts to update the design appropriatelyComplete and review life insurance application paperworkWork closely with insurance company case managers to ensure all items are processed and policies are issued in an efficient and timely mannerPrepare and send Portfolio Summaries to clients after coverage has been placed inforceBreakdown underwriting files and inform Client Services team of future administrative obligations for the portfolioQualifications: Strong knowledge of the life insurance underwriting process and life insurance terminology preferred3-5 years’ experience in the life insurance industry preferredKnowledge of broker-dealer and licensing preferredStrong understanding of life insurance risk classificationsGeneral medical knowledge (ability to read Attending Physician Statements)Strong interpersonal and communication skills – written and verbalStrong negotiating skillsStrong problem-solving skillsProficient in Word and ExcelAbility to work in a fast-paced environment along a steep learning curveAbility to organize, prioritize and manage multiple tasks and requestsAbility to work under pressure and meet deadlines while being pro-activeHighly detail orientedExercises good judgmentJob Type: Full-timePay: $80,000.00 - $90,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceDisability insuranceHealth insuranceLife insurancePaid time offSchedule:8 hour shiftSupplemental Pay:Bonus payApplication Question(s):Do you have knowledge of broker-dealer and licensing?Do you have strong interpersonal and communication skills - written and verbal?Do you have strong negotiating skills?Do you have strong problem-solving skills?Are you Proficient in Word and Excel?Are you detail oriented?Experience:Life Insurance: 3 years (Required)Work Location:One location"
121,121,San+Diego,underwriter,"PRIMARY JOB OBJECTIVEManage and develop department team leads and underwriting assistants dedicated to each of our West Coast Programs. Act as a liaison to Program Managers, program production teams and internal/external customers. Effectively manage operations and processes associated with policy service activities (i.e., support business from initial submission through policy issuance and accounting for the policy life cycle). Implement and execute performance standards and monitor those standards to ensure quality and metrics for program platforms are met. Collaborate with underwriting, and service staff to identify training needs, assess quality/performance standards and ensure priorities are responsive to marketing, underwriting and retention decisions. Participates in the strategic development of policy workflow and service standards (SOPs) and implementation to ensure quality metrics for program platforms are met. Manage workloads and priorities of the West Coast Program Team to support strategic goals. Ensure compliance with Carrier filed products and service standards. Drive alignment and consistency of operations across locations. Have a proactive approach in identifying and resolving issues. Identify staffing as needed to ensure scalability to match growth of the Company.JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESParticipate in the implementation of business strategies to effectively achieve policy service objectives.Participate in the implementation of operational and policy service SOP’s workflow processes and standards. Ensure effective implementation.Manage account support activities to meet production goals; assure compliance and performance standards are achieved; provide management information as necessary; utilize available resources in a cost-effective manner.Effectively manage production information reports.Act in a collaborative capacity with both internal and external customers to resolve problems/issues quickly. Establish priorities and make workflow decisions.Assure that our contractual commitments are met.Act in a proactive manner; resolve matters resulting in bottleneck situations to assure business results are not negatively affected by operational problems.Develop and maintain positive and productive relationships through on-going dialogue with Underwriting Management, Underwriters & agents/brokers.Maintain an appropriate level of customer service.Participate in projects as assigned.Perform all necessary staff management functions; recruiting, training, development, goal setting and manage performance to support growth.Takes responsibility for own actions and decisions.Mentor less experienced members of the staff as needed.JOB SPECIFICATION DATA1. ESSENTIAL KNOWLEDGE AND TRAININGProficient with Microsoft Word, Excel and Access or other database experience required. Excellent math, problem solving, and project management skills required. Broad working knowledge of insurance coverages, procedures and rating. Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.2. WORK EXPERIENCEMinimum of 10 years’ experience in the property casualty insurance industry; 3-5 years leadership experience with direct management of staff. Policy Service background with emphasis in Workers Compensation. Experience with: Agency Management Systems, various Policy rating and issuance systems; IMS, Insurity, Policy Decisions a plus. Working knowledge of ALIR DMV Reporting, OFAC, ISO Rules/Forms, WC Rules/Forms, WCPols reporting, MVR Reports, ODEN and other various 3rd party Underwriting rating and risk assessment apps/tools.3. OTHER REQUIREMENTSBachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience required.Industry designations preferred (AINS, AU, CPCU)Job Type: Full-timePay: $40,170.00 - $165,665.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceEmployee assistance programEmployee discountFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offReferral programTuition reimbursementVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayWork Location:Multiple locationsBenefit Conditions:Waiting period may applyWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19COVID-19 Precaution(s):Remote interview process"
122,122,San+Diego,underwriter,"As a Founders First Capital Partners (FFCP) Underwriting Associate, your primary function will be evaluating all aspects of fast-growing small businesses in need of growth capital. You will be in charge of determining whether they are the right fit for an investment by FFCP. Working closely withthe business development team, you will help to move each potential through FFCP’s underwriting and credit analysis process as the lead credit analyst.This is accomplished through:Financial Analysis and ReviewReviewing all relevant diligence materials (including pitch decks, customer references, company product and service offerings, etc.)Conducting Diligence Calls with the prospective borrowersEvaluating key strengths, risks, and mitigating factorsPreparing and presenting an analysis of the potential borrower’s historical performance and future expectations for FFCP’s Credit CommitteeDeveloping pricing packages and presenting forward looking projections to the Credit CommitteePreparing an internal memorandum of your finding for review by FFCP’s Investment CommitteePerforming tasks necessary to the close the transaction, including the preparation of key legal documentsAdditional responsibilities:The ability and willingness to jump on ad-hoc projects/requests as needed and customary in an early-stage, venture backed environmentMaintaining data and relevant borrower information in Salesforce.com and FFCP’s online underwriting and servicing platforms.Desired Background, Experience & InterestsThis role calls for a dynamic individual who wants to help fund growing technology businesses through a product that combines some of the best features of equity and debt. The right candidate loves talking with entrepreneurs, learning about emerging technologies, and evaluating businessmodels. You are self-driven and have the capacity to take ownership of your role, yet are committed to the team and building the company at large. This is a team sport, both with customers and colleagues.Financials:You need to have an understanding of basic accounting - both accrual and cashYou need to have experience evaluating businesses based on their financial performanceYou need to have experience presenting recommendations rooted in financial analysisBusiness:You have a desire to learn about new business models and financing optionsYou have experience evaluating risks in underlying business models that could impact future performanceQualifications: An undergraduate degree with focus in business, finance, accounting, or economics preferredExperience in small business credit, at a commercial bank or similar, is highly desirableExcellent analytical skills with a demonstrated ability to synthesize and organize data and informationHighly proficient in Microsoft Office suite of tools, in particular ExcelAbility to work independentlyStrong verbal and written communication skillsAttention to detail and a commitment to performing quality workCompensation:Competitive base salary plus an incentive-based bonusStock optionsJob Type: Full-timePay: $65,000.00 - $85,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insuranceVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftSupplemental Pay:Bonus payCommission payApplication Question(s):Do you have at least two years of experience in financial services or startup finance?Do you have experience in small business lending, at a commercial bank or somewhere similar?Do you have an understanding of basic accounting - both accrual and cash?Do you have experience evaluating businesses based on their financial performance?Do you have a bachelor's degree in accounting, business, finance, or economics?Do you live in San Diego, CA or Seattle, WA?Education:Bachelor's (Required)Experience:Accounting: 3 years (Required)Language:English (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:Temporarily due to COVID-19"
123,123,San+Diego,underwriter,"At Liberty Mutual, our purpose is to help people embrace today and confidently pursue tomorrow. That's why we provide an environment focused on openness, inclusion, trust and respect. Here, you'll discover our expansive range of roles, and a workplace where we aim to help turn your passion into a rewarding profession. We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to make things better, and we put people first by offering you benefits that support your life and well-being. To learn more, please visit https://www.libertymutualgroup.com/about-lm/careers/benefits
Liberty Mutual has proudly been recognized as a “Great Place to Work” by Great Place to Work® US for the past several years. We were also selected as one of the “100 Best Places to Work in IT” on IDG's Insider Pro and Computerworld's 2020 list.
We have been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Employers for Women and one of America's Best Employers for New Graduates—as well as one of America's Best Employers for Diversity. To learn more about our commitment to diversity and inclusion please visit: https://jobs.libertymutualgroup.com/diversity-inclusion
Liberty Mutual is an equal opportunity employer. We will not tolerate discrimination on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, age, disability, veteran's status, pregnancy, genetic information or on any basis prohibited by federal, state or local law.
We are focused on building our Construction team! Join our dedicated specialty underwriter group and own your territory! Liberty Mutual National Insurance Specialty Construction handles Middle Market to National Account-sized Construction business sharing specialized knowledge of construction and risk management with our agents and brokers. We foster underwriter judgment and emphasize local decision making. It's an excellent opportunity for a talented commercial insurance underwriter with construction expertise, confidence and deal orientation.



Responsibilities:
Develop and maintain highly effective business relationships with assigned agents and brokers in order to attract, develop/grow and retain profitable business in your assigned territory.

Evaluates a prospect's/renewal's financial standing, operational strategy, and industry trends to determine whether to proceed with the account, and if so, under what terms and conditions.

Performs a hazard analysis by combining knowledge and experience with available information on the prospect's/renewal's and its industry, and where appropriate, collaborates with experienced underwriters and other departments to evaluate a prospect's/renewal's potential exposure to loss.

Applies understanding of insurance with the hazards identified for the customer to assess the customer/broker request and determine acceptable coverage grants by line of business that address the customer's critical insurance and service needs.

Using assessments of the prospect's/renewal's operations and anticipated hazards, losses (primary & excess), and expenses (service requirements), applies knowledge of pricing tools, manual rates, rating plans, and reinsurance, develops a price for each coverage and rating plan option under consideration that meets or exceeds target returns, and has accountability and ownership of account pricing recommendations.

Given the customer/broker request, the hazard, coverage, and loss analyses, and the competitive situation, recommends program structures (coverage, limits/retention, rating plan/pricing, and billing combinations) achieving desired Business Unit goals, including long term profitability.

Completes all required steps on documentation and account management.

Communicate and collaborate across the organization- such as Claims, Product Management, Loss Control, Legal, Credit, Distribution, and Production- to provide solutions/recommendations and achieve organizational success.

Qualifications

The ideal candidate is a highly knowledgeable and disciplined underwriter with experience managing construction risks and a track record of growing a book of business that performs well over the long term.
Excellent knowledge of commercial insurance coverages, contracts and underwriting guidelines as normally acquired and a related bachelors degree eight to ten years of commercial lines underwriting experience preferred
Ability to make good business decisions based upon a mixture of analysis, wisdom, experience, and judgment.
Strong communication and influencing skills to build immediate credibility, both internally and externally; an ability to present effectively to a wide range of audiences
Ability to negotiate skillfully in tough situations; gains trust of others and has a good sense of timing
Insurance specific designations (e.g. CPCU, CRIS) desired

Bachelor's Degree

16"
124,124,San+Diego,underwriter,"JOB CAN BE PERFORMED REMOTELYResponsible for preparing Credit Authorizations (CA’s) to be presented for approval to the Credit Administrator and/or the Chief Credit Officer (CCO) and/or Loan Committee on new loans, renewals and modifications .QUALIFICATIONSBachelors Degree in Math, Business or related field, preferred.Knowledge of banking and lending operations and procedures, and the various regulations and standard banking practices.Minimum of 7 years of experience in the lending area of a financial institution. (Ideally 10 +)Job Type: Full-timePay: $100,000.00 - $110,000.00 per yearSchedule:Monday to Friday"
147,147,San+Diego,underwriter,"Overview:

Position: Jumbo Underwriter
Position Summary:
Primary responsibilities include providing the thorough evaluation of credit and property documents in loan files, identify potential risks, and advise as to the appropriate decision of the file as it relates to approving, declining or suspending the loan based upon New American Funding's underwriting guidelines concerning borrower eligibility and investors' requirements. Other duties include maintaining underwriting turn times, working with processors and loan officers to provide guidance on a case-by-case basis, and keep up with guidelines as set forth by Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac, Appendix Q, and multiple delegated Jumbo investors.
Responsibilities:
Review all loan submissions submitted by production and origination staff and generate initial credit decision in accordance with FNMA, FHLMC, Non-Agency Jumbo, New American Funding Non-QM, and other private investor guidelines as well as internal overlays.
Ability to underwrite to multiple Non-Agency Jumbo investors in a changing market and regulatory environment.
Evaluate mortgage loan applications to determine eligibility, acceptability, and compliance with applicable state, federal and investor guidelines.
Perform credit and property analysis on conventional and Non-Agency Jumbo files.
Analyze complex tax returns and accurately calculate income.
Identify key loan factors impacting borrower eligibility, property eligibility and credit qualification for complex or atypical financial profiles, collateral and loan structures
Perform timely reviews of submitted conditions and loan resubmissions and complete credit decisions for complex loans assumed from colleagues
Identify and summarize Exception loans for escalation to Credit Manager for business decision
Input data and notes into the Encompass loan system.
Maintain quality and production standards as set forth by management.
Effectively communicate, orally, in writing, and via email, the decisions reached as to maintain positive working relationships with coworkers and customers.
Ability to explain specific reasons for negative credit decisions and recommend possible solutions.
Other duties may be assigned.
Qualifications:
Non-conforming/Non-Agency Jumbo underwriting experience
Superior knowledge of and experience with property and credit underwriting requirements of FNMA, FHLMC, Non-Agency Jumbo, and other private investor guidelines, as well as other loan programs and private mortgage insurance companies.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Superior analytical, organizational and problem solving abilities.
Ability to work independently, analyze data, take and recommend appropriate actions with minimal supervision.
Capability of working in a fast-paced environment, under pressure and meet time-sensitive deadlines, all while maintaining a high level of professionalism.
Qualifications:
High School Diploma or equivalent.
Five or more years' mortgage underwriting experience with Non-Conforming or Non-Agency Jumbo loans.
Experience with Encompass 360
Work Authorization: Must be able to verify identity and employment eligibility to work in the U.S.
Other Duties: This job profile is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of job duties and responsibilities, as one may perform additional related duties as assigned in order to meet the needs of the organization.
Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Must be able to lift up to ten pounds. Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight; to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information. VISION: See in the normal visual range with or without correction. HEARING: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.
[EOE/M/F/D/V. Drug-free workplace.]
#LI-BT1"
150,150,San+Diego,underwriter,"Axos:

Born digital, Axos Bank has reinvented the banking model and grown to over $14 billion in assets since our founding in 2000. With a broad and ever-growing range of financial products, Axos Bank is rated among the top 5 digital banks in the country! Axos Financial is our holding company and publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol ""AX (NYSE: AX).
We bring together human insight and digital expertise to anticipate the needs of our customers. Our team members are innovative, technologically sophisticated, and motivated to achieve.
Learn more about working here!
The Role:

Axos Bank is seeking an Underwriting Manager to hire, lead, motivate and mentor a team of local and remote underwriters.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Responsible for underwriting pipeline management to ensure the team is producing high quality loans at maximum efficiency, with superior customer service while maintaining service levels
Review internal and external quality control findings to be used as training and coaching opportunities
Maintain thorough knowledge of guidelines, policies, and procedures
Develop and update procedural manuals and checklists
Participate in the revision and training of Credit Risk policies, processes, and procedures to ensure compliance and maximize productivity within risk parameters
Responsible for any applicable second level reviews and loan dispositions within required timeframes
Resolve customer related problems and loan level issues as they are escalated
Develop and execute process improvement enhancements to increase productivity, quality, and efficiency
Coach and counsel the direct reports and team associates for peak performance
Implement goals and initiatives as communicated by senior management and prepare accurate and timely performance reviews
Other duties as assigned
Are You A Fit? :
5+ years' in credit risk roles of increased responsibility in mortgage lending products/portfolios
3+ years' in underwriting management
Must have in-depth knowledge of ECOA and Reg B guidelines
Strong knowledge of mortgage lending to include mortgage products and an understanding of other types of financial products is desirable
Excellent decision making, problem solving, and organizational skills
Must be detail-oriented with excellent analytical skills, be adaptable to change, and have a data driven mentality
Proven ability to interpret and communicate regulatory guidance
Excellent customer service skills
Superb oral and written communication skills, and interpersonal skills
Strong leadership and team building skills; must be able to effectively lead and develop employees
Advanced computer skills including all MS Office systems
Extensive lending compliance knowledge
Extensive leadership experience within a team environment setting
Must have the ability to handle multiple priorities and produce results
Must take initiative and be an innovative problem solver
Ability to work under pressure, multi-task and meet deadlines in a fast paced environment
Willingness to perform multiple functions throughout the day as the need arises
Preferred:
Experience with government loans (FHA/VA)
Apply directly for consideration as we are not using any outside agencies for any of our openings:

Pre-Employment Drug Test:
All offers are contingent upon the candidate successfully passing a credit check, criminal background check, and pre-employment drug screening, which includes screening for marijuana. Axos Bank is a federally regulated banking institution. At the federal level, marijuana is an illegal schedule 1 drug; therefore, we will not employ any person who tests positive for marijuana, regardless of state legalization.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
Axos Bank is an Equal Opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religious creed, color, sex (including pregnancy, breast feeding and related medical conditions), gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military and veteran status, marital status, age, protected medical condition, genetic information, physical disability, mental disability, or any other protected status in accordance with all applicable federal, state and local laws.
Job Functions and Work Environment:
While performing the duties of this position, the employee is required to sit for extended periods of time. Manual dexterity and coordination are required while operating standard office equipment such as computer keyboard and mouse, calculator, telephone, copiers, etc.
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee may encounter while performing the essential functions of this position. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position."
151,151,San+Diego,underwriter,"The Conventional Underwriter I reviews, conditions, and underwrites mortgage loans according to established policies and procedures and appropriate guidelines; examines all documentation for accuracy and completeness.
Essential Functions:
Evaluate mortgage loan applications to determine eligibility, acceptability, and compliance with applicable state, federal, and investor guidelines to a maximum LTV of 80% for non-self-employed borrowers.
Submit loan files to DU and LPA AUS systems to determine eligibility and clear all conditions as issued by the applicable AUS findings.
Perform credit and property analysis on conventional loan files.
Identify key loan factors impacting borrower eligibility, property eligibility, and credit qualification.
Perform timely reviews of submitted conditions and loan resubmissions and complete credit decisions.
Identify and summarize Exception loans for escalation to Team Lead and/or Underwriting Manager for business decision.
Input data and notes into the Encompass loan system.
Maintain quality and production standards as set forth by management.
Effectively communicate, orally, in writing, and via email, the decisions reached as to maintain positive working relationships with coworkers and retail production staff members.
Ability to explain specific reasons for negative credit decisions and recommend possible solutions.
Assist in clearing conditions for other team members as assigned by management.
Other duties may be assigned.
Requirements:
Conventional Conforming underwriting experience.
Superior knowledge of and experience with property and credit underwriting requirements of FNMA and FHLMC guidelines
DU and LPA AUS Data Input Experience
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Superior analytical, organizational, and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to work independently, analyze data, take and recommend appropriate actions with minimal supervision.
Capability of working in a fast-paced environment, under pressure, and meet time-sensitive deadlines, all while maintaining a high level of professionalism.
Benefit Eligibility:
Cornerstone First Mortgage offers a comprehensive benefits package, including medical, dental, and vision plans, 401k match after 6 months of service, and paid time off.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
Cornerstone First Mortgage is proud to be Equal Opportunity Employers committed to creating a diverse and inclusive workforce. We consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, religion, color, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or other legally protected classifications.
KDAHR4aOUr"
178,178,San+Diego,underwriter,"Axos:

Born digital, Axos Bank has reinvented the banking model and grown to over $14 billion in assets since our founding in 2000. With a broad and ever-growing range of financial products, Axos Bank is rated among the top 5 digital banks in the country! Axos Financial is our holding company and publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol ""AX (NYSE: AX).
We bring together human insight and digital expertise to anticipate the needs of our customers. Our team members are innovative, technologically sophisticated, and motivated to achieve.
Learn more about working here!
The Role:

Axos Bank is seeking an Underwriting Manager to hire, lead, motivate and mentor a team of local and remote underwriters.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Responsible for underwriting pipeline management to ensure the team is producing high quality loans at maximum efficiency, with superior customer service while maintaining service levels
Review internal and external quality control findings to be used as training and coaching opportunities
Maintain thorough knowledge of guidelines, policies, and procedures
Develop and update procedural manuals and checklists
Participate in the revision and training of Credit Risk policies, processes, and procedures to ensure compliance and maximize productivity within risk parameters
Responsible for any applicable second level reviews and loan dispositions within required timeframes
Resolve customer related problems and loan level issues as they are escalated
Develop and execute process improvement enhancements to increase productivity, quality, and efficiency
Coach and counsel the direct reports and team associates for peak performance
Implement goals and initiatives as communicated by senior management and prepare accurate and timely performance reviews
Other duties as assigned
Are You A Fit? :
5+ years' in credit risk roles of increased responsibility in mortgage lending products/portfolios
3+ years' in underwriting management
Must have in-depth knowledge of ECOA and Reg B guidelines
Strong knowledge of mortgage lending to include mortgage products and an understanding of other types of financial products is desirable
Excellent decision making, problem solving, and organizational skills
Must be detail-oriented with excellent analytical skills, be adaptable to change, and have a data driven mentality
Proven ability to interpret and communicate regulatory guidance
Excellent customer service skills
Superb oral and written communication skills, and interpersonal skills
Strong leadership and team building skills; must be able to effectively lead and develop employees
Advanced computer skills including all MS Office systems
Extensive lending compliance knowledge
Extensive leadership experience within a team environment setting
Must have the ability to handle multiple priorities and produce results
Must take initiative and be an innovative problem solver
Ability to work under pressure, multi-task and meet deadlines in a fast paced environment
Willingness to perform multiple functions throughout the day as the need arises
Preferred:
Experience with government loans (FHA/VA)
Apply directly for consideration as we are not using any outside agencies for any of our openings:

Pre-Employment Drug Test:
All offers are contingent upon the candidate successfully passing a credit check, criminal background check, and pre-employment drug screening, which includes screening for marijuana. Axos Bank is a federally regulated banking institution. At the federal level, marijuana is an illegal schedule 1 drug; therefore, we will not employ any person who tests positive for marijuana, regardless of state legalization.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
Axos Bank is an Equal Opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religious creed, color, sex (including pregnancy, breast feeding and related medical conditions), gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military and veteran status, marital status, age, protected medical condition, genetic information, physical disability, mental disability, or any other protected status in accordance with all applicable federal, state and local laws.
Job Functions and Work Environment:
While performing the duties of this position, the employee is required to sit for extended periods of time. Manual dexterity and coordination are required while operating standard office equipment such as computer keyboard and mouse, calculator, telephone, copiers, etc.
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee may encounter while performing the essential functions of this position. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position."
179,179,San+Diego,underwriter,"The Conventional Underwriter I reviews, conditions, and underwrites mortgage loans according to established policies and procedures and appropriate guidelines; examines all documentation for accuracy and completeness.
Essential Functions:
Evaluate mortgage loan applications to determine eligibility, acceptability, and compliance with applicable state, federal, and investor guidelines to a maximum LTV of 80% for non-self-employed borrowers.
Submit loan files to DU and LPA AUS systems to determine eligibility and clear all conditions as issued by the applicable AUS findings.
Perform credit and property analysis on conventional loan files.
Identify key loan factors impacting borrower eligibility, property eligibility, and credit qualification.
Perform timely reviews of submitted conditions and loan resubmissions and complete credit decisions.
Identify and summarize Exception loans for escalation to Team Lead and/or Underwriting Manager for business decision.
Input data and notes into the Encompass loan system.
Maintain quality and production standards as set forth by management.
Effectively communicate, orally, in writing, and via email, the decisions reached as to maintain positive working relationships with coworkers and retail production staff members.
Ability to explain specific reasons for negative credit decisions and recommend possible solutions.
Assist in clearing conditions for other team members as assigned by management.
Other duties may be assigned.
Requirements:
Conventional Conforming underwriting experience.
Superior knowledge of and experience with property and credit underwriting requirements of FNMA and FHLMC guidelines
DU and LPA AUS Data Input Experience
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Superior analytical, organizational, and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to work independently, analyze data, take and recommend appropriate actions with minimal supervision.
Capability of working in a fast-paced environment, under pressure, and meet time-sensitive deadlines, all while maintaining a high level of professionalism.
Benefit Eligibility:
Cornerstone First Mortgage offers a comprehensive benefits package, including medical, dental, and vision plans, 401k match after 6 months of service, and paid time off.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
Cornerstone First Mortgage is proud to be Equal Opportunity Employers committed to creating a diverse and inclusive workforce. We consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, religion, color, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or other legally protected classifications.
KDAHR4aOUr"
180,180,San+Diego,underwriter,"Overview:

Position: Jumbo Underwriter
Position Summary:
Primary responsibilities include providing the thorough evaluation of credit and property documents in loan files, identify potential risks, and advise as to the appropriate decision of the file as it relates to approving, declining or suspending the loan based upon New American Funding's underwriting guidelines concerning borrower eligibility and investors' requirements. Other duties include maintaining underwriting turn times, working with processors and loan officers to provide guidance on a case-by-case basis, and keep up with guidelines as set forth by Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac, Appendix Q, and multiple delegated Jumbo investors.
Responsibilities:
Review all loan submissions submitted by production and origination staff and generate initial credit decision in accordance with FNMA, FHLMC, Non-Agency Jumbo, New American Funding Non-QM, and other private investor guidelines as well as internal overlays.
Ability to underwrite to multiple Non-Agency Jumbo investors in a changing market and regulatory environment.
Evaluate mortgage loan applications to determine eligibility, acceptability, and compliance with applicable state, federal and investor guidelines.
Perform credit and property analysis on conventional and Non-Agency Jumbo files.
Analyze complex tax returns and accurately calculate income.
Identify key loan factors impacting borrower eligibility, property eligibility and credit qualification for complex or atypical financial profiles, collateral and loan structures
Perform timely reviews of submitted conditions and loan resubmissions and complete credit decisions for complex loans assumed from colleagues
Identify and summarize Exception loans for escalation to Credit Manager for business decision
Input data and notes into the Encompass loan system.
Maintain quality and production standards as set forth by management.
Effectively communicate, orally, in writing, and via email, the decisions reached as to maintain positive working relationships with coworkers and customers.
Ability to explain specific reasons for negative credit decisions and recommend possible solutions.
Other duties may be assigned.
Qualifications:
Non-conforming/Non-Agency Jumbo underwriting experience
Superior knowledge of and experience with property and credit underwriting requirements of FNMA, FHLMC, Non-Agency Jumbo, and other private investor guidelines, as well as other loan programs and private mortgage insurance companies.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Superior analytical, organizational and problem solving abilities.
Ability to work independently, analyze data, take and recommend appropriate actions with minimal supervision.
Capability of working in a fast-paced environment, under pressure and meet time-sensitive deadlines, all while maintaining a high level of professionalism.
Qualifications:
High School Diploma or equivalent.
Five or more years' mortgage underwriting experience with Non-Conforming or Non-Agency Jumbo loans.
Experience with Encompass 360
Work Authorization: Must be able to verify identity and employment eligibility to work in the U.S.
Other Duties: This job profile is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of job duties and responsibilities, as one may perform additional related duties as assigned in order to meet the needs of the organization.
Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Must be able to lift up to ten pounds. Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight; to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information. VISION: See in the normal visual range with or without correction. HEARING: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.
[EOE/M/F/D/V. Drug-free workplace.]
#LI-BT1"
181,181,San+Diego,underwriter,"PURPOSE OF THE JOB

The purpose of this job is to ensure that Workers’ Compensation Underwriting (WCU) compliance programs are utilized appropriately to manage operational and compliance risks within the line of business. This position exists to ensure all regulatory and compliance requirements are met for the applicable jurisdictions/states.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Participates in the development and implementation of the WCU Compliance Program.

Assists with designing and ensuring compliance policies and procedures are followed throughout WCU.
Collaborates with professionals from different branches to verify Workers' Compensation Underwriting compliance requirements are being followed.
Retrieves and completes any reporting requirements specific to work comp underwriting.
Ensures internal controls are properly implemented and followed by WCU personnel.

Serves as WCU Compliance Subject Matter Expert on compliance related matters.

Researches WCU requirements and provides periodic updates on emerging compliance changes. Communicates to appropriate teams and formulates plans to make necessary changes.
Determines the impact of compliance changes on the WCU line of business.
Proposes modifications to existing programs to reflect needed modifications for upcoming compliance changes and ensures implementation.
Participates in cross-functional/cross-business initiatives, as needed.
Develops content for compliance related topics and delivers training to employees.

Performs audits on financial and procedural claims and recommends quality improvement measures.

Conducts financial and procedural audits based on various sampling methods.
Documents and trends audit findings.
Recommends quality improvement measures based on findings.
Meets with WCU Management team on a regular basis to discuss audit findings and recommendations.

SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES

This role does not have supervisory responsibilities.

EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE

Bachelor's degree from four-year college or university preferred with a major or emphasis in Business Administration, Management, or related field. Minimum 5 years of related underwriting and/or compliance experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.

CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS

Chartered Property and Casualty (CPCU) certification preferred.

KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS

Working knowledge of Workers’ Compensation insurance industry in an underwriter role. Knows requirements for NCCI, WCIRB, and other specific State reports such as WCIS or DWC’s. This position requires motivation, creativity, and ability to understand many areas of expertise. Ability to communicate professionally with all levels of management. Excellent verbal communication skills are necessary to produce and deliver quality training programs. Advanced understanding of Workers’ Compensation Underwriting principles and application. Excellent time management and organizational skills. Requires a high level of attention to detail. Team oriented and a sense of urgency for execution. Ability to effectively present information to top management, and/or public groups. Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Knowledge of compliance and auditing. Experience working with a property and casualty insurance company preferred. Ability to quickly understand and apply policies and procedures. Ability to research and interpret regulations and laws and disseminate information. Ability to multitask, organize, and prioritize work to meet deadlines. Ability to work with limited supervision. Intermediate to advanced level in Word, Excel, and PowerPoint.

PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS

Office environment – no specific or unusual physical or environmental demands and employees are regularly required to sit, walk, stand, talk, and hear.

WORK ENVIRONMENT

This position operates in an office environment and requires the frequent use of a computer, telephone, copier, and other standard office equipment.


#LI-SK1"
260,260,Dallas,underwriter,"Who we are
American International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading global insurance organization. Building on 100 years of experience, today AIG member companies provide a wide range of property casualty insurance, life insurance, retirement solutions, and other financial services to customers in more than 80 countries and jurisdictions. These diverse offerings include products and services that help businesses and individuals protect their assets, manage risks and provide for retirement security.
Get to know the business
General Insurance is a leading provider of insurance products and services for commercial

and personal insurance customers. It includes one of the world’s most far-reaching property casualty networks. General Insurance offers a broad range of products to customers through

a diversified, multichannel distribution network.
About the role
This role underwrites NA Casualty Products under general supervision, issuing quote and policies while ensuring standards and compliance guidelines are met. These individuals will analyze information and have the opportunity to connect with clients and brokers.
Responsibilities include :
The role will be responsible for underwriting Primary Casualty business
Evaluating, prioritizing and selecting submissions to be underwritten.
Identifying risk exposures, special or common hazards, claims experience and appropriate controls.
Analyzing claims and quantifying losses.
Adhering to guidelines and underwriting discipline to minimize exposure and appropriately price risks.
 Ensuring underwriting files and services standards and compliance guidelines are adhered to on assigned accounts.
Offering coverage, terms and conditions which generate a profit for the Company while meeting the needs of the customer.
Capturing market intelligence and broker feedback on accounts.
Demonstrating strong business acumen, financial and analytical skills, and critical thinking skills which lead to confident decision making and judgment.
Demonstrating success in negotiation and building collaborative relationships.
Multi-tasking, prioritizing and time management skills.
Appropriately balancing changing priorities based upon underwriting needs and performing within time constraints with a high volume of work.
Working with more senior underwriters or management on risks exceeding authority level or requiring special handling.
Selling and negotiating to achieve bottom line profitability for the Company.
Making presentations and communicating risk appetite and Financial Lines value proposition articulately to brokers and clients.
Contributing to development of producer strategies.
Developing and maintaining a submission pipeline sufficient to achieve overall production and business mix objective.
Providing superior customer service to brokers and clients (internal & external).
TECHNICAL SKILLS & EXPERIENCE:
1+ years of relevant professional experience; Insurance experience preferred.
Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university.
Working knowledge of financial statements and analysis.
Excellent interpersonal, communication and analytical skills.
Excellent organizational skills and ability to handle multiple tasks in a high-volume, fast-paced environment.
Ability to work in dynamic, rapidly changing environment, adapting to changing requirements and collaborating with a wide range of colleagues to quickly deliver solutions.
Ability to facilitate cross-function collaboration, especially regarding technical aspects.
Detail-oriented with demonstrated ability to self-direct, prioritize work, and meet deadlines.
Takes initiative on projects and assignments, seeks alternate solutions when necessary.
Highly motivated and results-oriented.
Exposure to NA Casualty products is preferred. (i.e. Environmental, Excess or Primary Casualty, NA Auto, WC, AL, GL, DBA, Foreign Casualty).
A look at our benefits (For U.S. and UK only)
At AIG, we have a 100-year legacy of working to make the world a better place. And that begins with our employees. We’re proud to offer a range of employee benefits and resources that help you protect what matters most – your health care, savings, financial protection, and wellbeing. We provide a variety of leaves for personal, health, family, and military needs. For example, the “Giving Back” program allows you to take up to 16 hours a year to volunteer in your community.
We also believe in fostering our employees’ development and offer a range of learning opportunities for employees to hone their professional skills to position themselves for the next steps of their careers. AIG also has a tuition reimbursement program for eligible employees to enhance their education, skills, and knowledge in areas that relate to their current position or future positions to which they may transfer or progress.
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer
It has been and will continue to be the policy of American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories. At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.
It has been and will continue to be the policy of American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories.
At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.
To learn more please visit: https://www.aig.com/about-us/diversity-equity-and-inclusion
AIG is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to job applicants and employees with physical or mental disabilities. If you believe you need a reasonable accommodation in order to search for a job opening or to complete any part of the application or hiring process, please send an email to candidatecare@aig.com . Reasonable accommodations will be determined on a case-by-case basis.
Functional Area:
UW - Underwriting
Estimated Travel Percentage (%): Up to 25%
Relocation Provided: No
National Union Fire Insurance Co of Pittsburgh, PA"
261,261,Dallas,underwriter,"***Long Term Contract Opportunity *** Benefits available (Health, Dental, Vision, 401K).
Hourly rates between $34-45/hr. based on background and experience
Total Earning Eligibility includes the following that could add additional $8,000 in first six months:
Hourly kicker incentives
Unlimited overtime
Sign on bonus
Quarterly performance bonus
Employee Referral bonus up to $1k (depending on position)
Want to Work with Really Great People? The lifeblood of Covius is our people. We are a tight-knit group and we're passionate about what we do. If you thrive on challenges and collaboration, and work hard no matter who is watching, we want to talk to you. At Covius, we believe it's possible to love coming to work. We don't do easy here. Standards are high, and we take pride in exceeding expectations. It's how we've gotten to where we are, and it's how we grow. We are a mid-sized company with a big heart. If you're looking for an opportunity that's authentic, meaningful and emphasizes living a balanced life, Covius is the place for you.
Summary
The Credit Underwriter is to issue credit decisions based on the documented borrower profile within the guidelines of the program and client requirements. Underwriters are to meet the minimum daily production goals plus clearing conditions and perform within department audit standards
Essential Functions
Underwrite residential mortgage loans in accordance with Conventional guidelines
Input of data and analysis of findings in Loan Prospector, Desktop Underwriter, Asset wise, other AUS engines, and OES
Identify and assess overall risk and potential fraud exposure resulting from clients' underlying business practices
Meet the minimum daily production goals plus clearing conditions and perform within department audit standards
Review of credit reports to determine credit patterns, current liabilities, outstanding judgments and collections
Review of residential mortgage appraisal forms and calculations of Loan to Value ratios
Analyze income from salaried, commissioned, self-employed, investments, fixed income sources
Analyze assets statements for all types of asset accounts
Education
High school diploma required/GED
Associate/Technical Degree Preferred
Experience
3-5 years of industry experience preferred
Essential Knowledge, Skills & Abilities
3 - 5 years of recent frontline (manual and automated) underwriting experience with Conventional, FHA and/or VA Knowledge along with A Paper, B/C Paper, Non-Confirming and Conforming, and Sub-Prime residential products
In-depth knowledge HVCC, guidelines and requirements along with all federal, state and local compliance regulations to include, Truth in Lending and Equal Credit Opportunity laws
In-depth knowledge of the total closing function to include, underwriting conditions prior to closing, closing instructions and procedures, and RESPA
Up-to-date knowledge in Fannie/Freddie guidelines, back end quality control and fraud audit experience
Must be able to use Desktop Underwriter (DU), Loan Prospector (LP) and other LOS (loan operations systems)
Proficient with the suite of Microsoft Office products
Internet and strong written communication skills
Ability to handle multiple tasks and prioritize file loads
Working Conditions
Work is performed in climate controlled indoor administrative office setting. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate, depending upon office or meeting location.
Physical Demands
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to communicate. The employee frequently is required to remain stationary. The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, use hands to finger, handle, or feel, reach with hands and arms, stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move 10 pounds.
Vision: Close and distance required with ability to see objects in presence of glare or bright lighting (e.g., computer screen).
Speech/Hearing: Frequently interact with management, vendors, coworkers, industry constituents, clients and the public.
Hourly rates between $32-45/hr. based on background and experience
Total Earning Eligibility includes the following that could add additional $8,000 in first six months:
Hourly kicker incentives
Unlimited overtime
Sign on bonus
Quarterly performance bonus
Employee Referral bonus up to $1k (depending on position)
Clayton a division of Covius Solutions is committed to equal opportunity in all employment practices to all qualified applicants and employees without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, age, national origin, pregnancy, disability, genetics, marital status, military or veteran status or any other protected category as established by local, state and federal law. This policy applies to all aspects of the employment relationship including recruitment and hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, compensation, disciplinary action, layoff, leaves of absence, training and termination. All such employment decisions will be made without unlawful discrimination based on any prohibited basis.
The essential functions, working conditions and physical demands described above are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.
IND01
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor???s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)"
262,262,Dallas,underwriter,"Key Responsibilities:· Responsible for manually assessing the risk of a loan and making a credit decision based on the quality of the data in the loan file· Applies all internal underwriting guidelines, investor underwriting guidelines and requirements as well as federal regulations to the decision process to ensure high loan quality· Determine specific investor program requirements and ensure credit underwriting review meets investor requirements· Perform detailed analysis and review of one-to-four family appraisals to determine if property meets investor guidelines· Review credit documents for accuracy and completeness· Partner with the Production and Operations teams to ensure high quality loans· Communicate with loan officers, brokers and processors to create a positive customer experience· Provide feedback for pre-closing as well as post-closing quality control audits in a timely manner· Willingness to provide alternative solutions when neededQualifications:· 5+ years recent underwriting experience· Direct Endorsement required· SAR LAPP required· Recent experience underwriting alternative income documentation such as bank statements or assets-based underwriting· Recent experience with complex borrower business structures, including multiple REO and multiple self-employed entities and entity types· Strong understanding of Agency and Appendix Q underwriting guidelines· Exposure to underwriting at a national level and in multiple markets· Strong communication skills and ability to interact with investors and customers· Proficiency with EncompassJob Type: Full-timePay: $47,119.00 - $124,102.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insurancePhysical Setting:OfficeSchedule:8 hour shiftEducation:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No"
263,263,Dallas,underwriter,"Underwriter, Auto – Remote (West Region)

Ally and Your Career

Ally Financial only succeeds when its people do - and that’s more than some cliche people put on job postings. We live this stuff! We see our people as, well, people - with interests, families, friends, dreams and causes that are all important to them. Our focus is on the health and safety of our teammates as well as work-life balance and diversity and inclusion. From generous benefits to a variety of employee resource groups, we strive to build paths that encourage employees to stretch themselves professionally. We want to help you grow, develop, and learn new things. You’re constantly evolving, so shouldn’t your opportunities be, too?

The Opportunity

Due to continued volume growth and expansion, Ally is currently adding Underwriters in the West Region. These are remote (work from home) opportunities.

Our Underwriters are responsible for evaluating and decisioning consumer offerings within Ally underwriting policies. The expectation is to develop and maintain a high level of customer service for the assigned territory. The territory will require the management of a portfolio of dealers and bringing to bear the potential to further grow the business. This role comes with more challenging targets and requirements than the Associate Consumer Underwriter position.

The Work Itself

Maximize portfolio revenue by practicing sound underwriting judgment and risk management principles
Negotiating with our dealer clients to find solutions and growth opportunities
Ensure compliance with underwriting policies; elevate risk issues, and stay abreast of constant changes in policy and procedures
Limited travel will be needed
Requires flexibility in work schedule, evening hours and weekends will be required

The Skills You Bring

1+ years in auto finance consumer underwriting (prime, sub-prime, and/or non-prime) is needed
Bachelor's degree in business related subject area preferred
Prior Sales experience is helpful
Ability to leverage technical expertise and relationships to contribute to strategy and drive business results
Familiarity with the Auto Finance industry, consumer credit, trend analysis/analytics
Excellent sales, negotiation, problem solving, and analytical expertise
Must be an independent worker with strong time management skills

How We’ll Have Your Back

Ally's compensation program offers market-competitive base pay and pay-for-performance incentives (bonuses) based on achieving personal and company goals. But Ally’s total compensation – or total rewards – extends beyond your paycheck and is designed to support and enrich your personal and professional life, including:

Time Away: competitive holiday and flexible paid-time-off, including time off for volunteering and voting.
Planning for the Future: plan for the near and long term with an industry-leading 401K retirement savings plan with matching and company contributions, student loan and 529 educational assistance programs, tuition reimbursement, and other financial well-being programs.
Supporting your Health & Well-being: flexible health and insurance options including dental and vision, pre-tax Health Savings Account with employer contributions and a total well-being program that helps you and your family stay on track physically, socially, emotionally and financially.
Building a Family: adoption, surrogacy, and fertility support as well as parental and caregiver leave, back-up child and adult/elder day care program and child care discounts.
Work-Life Integration: other benefits including LifeMatters® Employee Assistance Program, subsidized and discounted Weight Watchers® program and other employee discount programs.

Who We Are

Ally Financial is a customer-centric, leading digital financial services company with passionate customer service and innovative financial solutions. We are relentlessly focused on ""Doing it Right"" and being a trusted financial-services provider to our consumer, commercial, and corporate customers. For more information, visit www.ally.com.

Ally is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity and inclusion in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy status, marital status, military or veteran status, genetic disposition or any other reason protected by law.

We are committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to applicants with physical or mental disabilities. For accommodation requests, email us at work@ally.com. Ally will not discriminate against any qualified individual who is capable of performing the essential functions of the job with or without reasonable accommodation.

In accordance with Colorado law, CO job seekers*

Starting CO pay:

$26.44 per hour

This role is eligible for an annual bonus program based on individual and corporate performance.

This is the starting pay for this role. Actual offers to be negotiated based on applicant’s skills, education and experience.
Please note that this information is provided for those hired in Colorado only, and this role is open to candidates outside of Colorado as well."
264,264,Dallas,underwriter,"Our Senior Underwriter - Express ensures a profitable book of Property and Casualty insurance business by appropriately pre-qualifying risks within delegated authority levels. Partners with agents to manage and grow a multi-line book of business by evaluating, selecting, and pricing risks primarily on accounts with less than $25,000 in premium, bringing speed and quick turnaround times to help you win with smaller business clients. Demonstrates decision-making authority under moderate supervision, recommending quality exceptions where appropriate to maximize profitability and meet business plans. Responsible for working with and protecting confidential and proprietary customer and Company information.
Responsibilities:
Risk Selection: evaluates or assesses the business applying for insurance by qualifying accounts; identifying, selecting and assessing risks; determining the premium, policy terms and conditions; obtaining approvals; creating/presenting the proposal to the agent/broker and successfully negotiating deals.
Agent/Broker Relationships: Develops and maintains successful relationships with Agents and Brokers by providing stewardship with service partners, including initial setup of service commitments, and regular visits.
Portfolio Management: Manages a book of business by analyzing the portfolio, identifying areas of opportunity for improved growth, profit and diversification, and executing marketing plans to increase market share with preferred brokers.
Documenting the Deal: Documents files in a way that reflects a solid thought process and decision making through comprehensive account reviews, sign-offs and referrals.
Leadership: Formally and informally guides, mentors, and coaches underwriters in both technical and professional skills.
Continuous Improvement: Actively participates in continuous improvement by fully engaging in daily huddles, generating suggestions, following appropriate procedures and work principles, participating in problem solving activities, and using continuous improvement tools to support the work of the team.
Bachelor's degree preferred.
Five or more years of commercial lines underwriting experience preferred. CPCU or professional insurance designation preferred.
Comprehensive knowledge of commercial lines products and contract knowledge including regulatory and policy differences among applicable states.
Intermediate-level knowledge of insurance products/coverage, market segments and marketplace; insurance finance and actuarial concepts; loss control/risk engineering; marketing/selling techniques, regulatory environment and reinsurance;
Advanced-level knowledge of underwriting, pricing, risk selection, territory management.
Ability to apply underwriting/appetite, tools, systems, and resources to achieve goals, solve complex problems, establish and build healthy working relationships, participate in mentoring relationships.
At Liberty Mutual, our purpose is to help people embrace today and confidently pursue tomorrow. That's why we provide an environment focused on openness, inclusion, trust and respect. Here, you'll discover our expansive range of roles, and a workplace where we aim to help turn your passion into a rewarding profession.
Liberty Mutual has proudly been recognized as a “Great Place to Work” by Great Place to Work® US for the past several years. We were also selected as one of the “100 Best Places to Work in IT” on IDG's Insider Pro and Computerworld's 2020 list. For many years running, we have been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Employers for Women and one of America's Best Employers for New Graduates—as well as one of America's Best Employers for Diversity. To learn more about our commitment to diversity and inclusion please visit: https://jobs.libertymutualgroup.com/diversity-inclusion
We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to make things better, and we put people first by offering you benefits that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/Benefits
Liberty Mutual is an equal opportunity employer. We will not tolerate discrimination on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, age, disability, veteran's status, pregnancy, genetic information or on any basis prohibited by federal, state or local law.

15"
265,265,Dallas,underwriter,"Join our team as a Mortgage Underwriter. If you have experience in Retail or Correspondent Front Line Mortgage Underwriting come build a fulfilling career with us.Why our team?Industry Competitive Compensation: Competitive salaries, a $10,000 sign-on bonus, and paid health benefits.Longstanding Experience: With over 30 years of experience, we have built relationships with some of the world’s most recognized companies by providing end to end mortgage services solutions.Tenured and Supportive Executives: With 20 years average tenure, our leadership team has held executive roles in top organizations in the mortgage industry.Work for Industry Leaders: We have partnered with some of the industry’s leading mortgage lenders, including top 10 originators, regional banks, and financial services companies.Work-life Balance: Enjoy the flexibility of working full time from home with scheduling options, and opportunities for overtime.Growth Opportunities and Stability: We encourage career development and offer growth opportunities from within. We are constantly acquiring new programs that offer you new challenges and opportunities to learn and the flexibility of shifting to other programs.Supportive Teams:  We are a collaborative, considerate and friendly team that prioritizes having a diverse, inclusive, and respectful workplace.The role: Our Underwriters are responsible for approval/decline decisions on incoming applications consistent with internal, client and investor policies.The duties: Apply internal guidelines and investor guidelines to the credit decision process.Prioritize deals in Workflow queue in order to minimize turnaround time.Analyze employment profile, credit strength, property characteristics, and all other information pertinent to the credit decision on each mortgage application.Select required conditions on each deal to be satisfied prior to funding and input information into the system.Verify accuracy of supporting employment, down payment, appraisal, and financial documentation received.Review documentation for compliance with internal and regulatory guidelines.Correspond with processors to get outstanding documentation needed to complete requirements per the commitment.Qualifications: 3+ years of prior Mortgage Underwriting experienceExperience underwriting complex loans involving multiple income sourcesStrong verbal and written communication and analytical skillsDemonstrated ability to resolve complicated issues as they ariseProven organizational skills and demonstrated ability to prioritize and multi-taskPrior AUS experience requiredPrior experience with FNMA/FHLMC guidelinesPortfolio/Private Investor experience would be a plus.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timePay: $28.00 - $56.00 per hourEducation:Bachelor's (Preferred)Experience:Fair Housing Regulations: 1 year (Preferred)Underwriting: 1 year (Preferred)"
266,266,Dallas,underwriter,"Commercial Underwriter
Position Overview
The Commercial Banking Underwriting Program provides a structured learning opportunity for individuals (Underwriters) to learn and develop technical underwriting skills. Underwriters participate in an approximately 18 - 24-month training program, including orientation, formal underwriting training, and a formal mentorship with an Underwriting Officer. Underwriters complete evaluation and documentation of the loan requests for assigned LOBs (Lines of Business); own deal analyses and execute workflow according to established SLAs (Service Level Agreements). Underwriters assist in the on-going monitoring of the credit exposure for assigned relationships, including renewals, reaffirmations and annual risk ratings.

Position Responsibilities:
Credit
Acquires technical skills through structured curriculum and apply knowledge and skills to on-the-job assignments.
Provides complete analysis of loan package for new deals, as well as reviews of existing relationships, utilizing the various underwriting methods as established by Credit Administration.
Prepares list of questions and summary of outstanding issues when underwriting loan requests with Underwriting Officer or Manager guidance.
Prepares loan packages; writes Officer and/or Credit comments with assistance from Relationship Manager (RM) or Portfolio Manager (PM); and provides complete credit documentation of the loan application by utilizing loan approval documents and other various addendums as established by Credit Administration.
Applies appropriate loan structures; prepares collateral charts, cash flows, risk ratings, and other pertinent attachments.
Provides industry analysis, spreads financial statements, and identifies and analyzes inconsistencies and inaccuracies within the customer provided financial statements.
Evaluates strengths and weaknesses of the credit and escalate risks and other issues; where appropriate while assisting the RM/PM with contacting customers to obtain answers for loan analyses. These responsibilities are to be completed with Underwriting Officer or Manager guidance.
Meets the service level agreements for volumes, accuracy, and timeliness. Minimizes errors and reword situations.
Understands and applies relevant credit policies to the underwriting process.
If applicable, recommend effective loan covenants to monitor financial performance and regularly calculate covenant package to ensure compliance.
Accurately completes risk ratings.
Administration
Where applicable, monitors loan covenants and tracking in conjunction with the Credit support team for assigned relationships.
Shares responsibility with Credit Support Specialists for performing OFAC checks and identifying issues.
Investigates title searches, surveys and UCC (Uniform Commercial Code) searches as requested by Manager, Underwriting Officer, or RM/PM.
Comply with regulatory requirements; Complete and apply required credit, regulatory, system, and process training.
Process Sustainability
Adhere to department procedures for workload management and strives to meet or exceed SLA and when not feasible, communicates to Manager and RM/PM.
Ensures appropriate loan approval document formats/attachments are used in accordance with approved process & procedures.
Other duties as assigned

Position Qualifications:

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree
Two (2) Accounting courses (minimum 6 units)
1 year of experience in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Business, Economics or similar degree field.
Minimum two Accounting courses (6 units).
Overall GPA of 3.0 and 3.0 GPA in two Accounting courses.
1 year of experience in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook
Demonstrated leadership and strong verbal and written communication skills
Comerica Bank Tower
8:00am - 5:00pm Monday - Friday"
267,267,Dallas,underwriter,"Synergy One Lending is hiring an Underwriter! Do you want to be part of the modern mortgage experience? We leverage technology to provide our customers with an experience built for speed, ease, and expertise. Part of our mission is to be known as the nation’s #1 lender in employee morale and retention. Our team has decades of experience in the mortgage loan industry where we all help each other learn and grow. If you are looking to up the ante in your career, come join Synergy One Lending as our Underwriter and be a part of the Synergy One Lending success story!Summary:The Underwriter 3 will be responsible for underwriting conventional, FHA, USDA and VA mortgage loan applications, as well as additional loan types as determined by VP Operations, and rendering decisions within internal and regulatory guidelines.Essential Functions:Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Job duties include, but are not limited to, the following:Evaluate credit risk in accordance with all investor, federal, company and agency standards, policies, and guidelines.Evaluate and ensure accuracy of customers credit, income, and assets.Review appraisal and property information to ensure eligibility of property.Review all aspects of the loan file, including title and appraisal reports.Set the terms for approval or identify reasons for rejection. Provide options and recommendations, when applicable.Effectively communicate all loan decisions and/or request additional information/documentation to sales channels and management, as needed.Work closely with all operational departments to establish productive and efficient workflows.Ensure accuracy of Automated Underwriting Systems to match actual information reviewed and verified.Continue education to stay current with regulations and industry requirements that affect decision making.Meets minimum production and turn-time expectations while maintaining high quality.Other Duties as assigned.Required Skills/ Abilities: High degree of attention to detail and demonstrated organizational skills.Strong written and verbal communications skills.Demonstrated teamwork and customer service skills.Ability to analyze policies, procedures and guidelines in a way that maximizes productivity but protects the level of risk desired.Proficiency with MS Office and applicable mortgage software.Supervisory Responsibilities:This position does not have direct reports.Education and Experience: High school diploma or equivalent required; bachelor’s degree strongly preferred.3-5 years of recent underwriting experience required.FHA DE and SAR required.Knowledge of conventional, federal, and state guidelines required.Knowledge of credit underwriting and property evaluation required.Must have experience with Mortgage origination systems, platforms tools and technology.Physical Demands/ Environment: Prolonged periods sitting at a desk and working on a computer.Must be able to lift up to 15 pounds at times.EEO: Synergy One Lending provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.Job Type: Full-timeBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceDisability insuranceFlexible spending accountHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayEducation:High school or equivalent (Preferred)Experience:Underwriting: 3 years (Required)License/Certification:DE, SAR/LAPP/VA certification? (Required)Work Remotely:Yes"
268,268,Dallas,underwriter,"AIG’s underwriters develop insurance solutions that address the exposures of companies and individuals, and embody AIG’s tradition of innovation, bringing to market ground-breaking insurance solutions for our changing world. AIG’s underwriters help to find insurance solutions for risks from a range of areas including life insurance, commercial property and business interruption, aviation, financial lines, casualty, environmental, catastrophic events, high net worth individuals, and boardroom liabilities.
AIG has an exciting opportunity to join the Property underwriting support team and assist the Retail Property field underwriters.
Your contribution at AIG
You will contribute to the growth and profitability of the Retail Property unit by providing underwriting and administration support to allocated underwriters as well as the global property underwriting community. Ensure exceptional customer service to both internal and external parties and consistently meet service levels and performance targets in terms of volume, accuracy and quality. This role reports to a cross regional Underwriting Support Manager within Property Operations.
Key Accountabilities and Responsibilities
Partner with regional underwriters for end-to-end processing of new and renewal business.
Works closely with field underwriters and CoE partners to develop and deliver tailored solutions.
Work with allocated underwriters to set-up systems and underwriting platforms.
Review location data and CAT modeling results are reported accurately.
Preform data analytics, remodeling when necessary, referral documentation preparation and completion, as well as form checklist and working approval.
Quote, binder/slip, policy, and endorsement preparation and issuance.
Participate in post-binding and servicing activities.
Complete all delegated projects in the manner expected and requested by the Manager.
What we are looking for
Bachelor’s degree preferred or equivalent work experience.
Prioritizing – able to navigate and switch between multiple proprietary, vendor, web-based and standard computer systems.
Microsoft Office – proficiency in Excel, Word and Power point
Learning Agility – willingness to learn from experiences and new situations.
Client Servicing – ability to anticipate client (internal and external) needs and act proactively.
Problem Solving – identify problems and solutions matched to the appropriate solutions.
Attention to Detail – demonstrate attention to detail to ensure accurate documentation is maintained.
It has been and will continue to be the policy of American International Group, Inc., its subsidiaries and affiliates to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We provide equal opportunity to all qualified individuals regardless of race, color, religion, age, gender, gender expression, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected categories.
At AIG, we believe that diversity and inclusion are critical to our future and our mission – creating a foundation for a creative workplace that leads to innovation, growth, and profitability. Through a wide variety of programs and initiatives, we invest in each employee, seeking to ensure that our people are not only respected as individuals, but also truly valued for their unique perspectives.
To learn more please visit: https://www.aig.com/about-us/diversity-equity-and-inclusion
AIG is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to job applicants and employees with physical or mental disabilities. If you believe you need a reasonable accommodation in order to search for a job opening or to complete any part of the application or hiring process, please send an email to candidatecare@aig.com . Reasonable accommodations will be determined on a case-by-case basis.
Functional Area:
UW - Underwriting
Estimated Travel Percentage (%): No Travel
Relocation Provided: No
AIG PC Global Services, Inc"
269,269,Dallas,underwriter,"Sprout Funding is an alternative lending firm located in Irving, TX. We are currently expanding our team to support growth of the company.Summary of the PositionUnderwrite commercial merchant cash advance funding applications in accordance with company guidelinesAnalyze data including business financials/ P&L’s, bank statements, credit reports, and tax returnsQ&A sessions with prospective clientsDetermine credit worthiness and approval of funding amountsEvaluate and provide recommendations for guideline exceptionsQualificationsRequired:Bachelor’s Degree (Finance, Economics, Mathematics or Business preferred)Ability to analyze and interpret cash flow and credit reportsMust be detailed oriented with solid analytical skillsMinimum of 1 years’ experience preferred within unsecured commercial lendingStrong communication skills as this role will involve communicating with clientsPreferred:Strong financial acumenFinancial services experienceAdvanced degreeAbility to interpret financial reports and legal documentsOur ideal candidate would have between 2 and 6 years’ experience, preferably with a financial services company. The candidate would be inquisitive, highly trainable/ a quick learner, and be extremely thorough in their work. Our Underwriting Department’s primary focus is to evaluate and mitigate portfolio risk during the diligence process.Only local candidates will be considered.Company Offers: Salary commensurate with experienceBenefits include medical/dental/vision insurancePaid/flexible vacation time and holidaysJob Type: Full-timeJob Type: Full-timePay: $58,190.00 - $65,434.00 per yearBenefits:Dental insuranceHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offVision insurancePhysical Setting:OfficeSchedule:8 hour shiftMonday to FridayEducation:Bachelor's (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No"
272,272,Dallas,underwriter,"Job Description

At Freddie Mac, you will do important work to build a better housing finance system and you’ll be part of a team helping to make homeownership and rental housing more accessible and affordable across the nation. Position Overview:

If you are a smart, motivated and intellectually driven professional with a passion for commercial real estate (CRE) and finance, Freddie Mac Multifamily is the employer for you! The nation’s greatest and most innovative secondary market Multifamily mortgage lender and issuer of securitized fixed-income with an annual platform exceeding $80 billion is looking to add a Multifamily Underwriter to the Targeted Affordable Housing team. Apply now and learn why there’s #MoreAtFreddieMac!

** This position can be performed currently from a remote location in the U.S. but will require presence in a Freddie Mac office in the future.***

Our Impact:
Our team is responsible for underwriting Targeted Affordable Housing (TAH) loans originated coast to coast by our network of Optigo Lenders.
We are innovators in the industry by evaluating the story and making decisions based on the credit risk profile and finding creative ways to mitigate risks.

Your Impact:
You will build toward credit approval and closing individual mortgage loans collateralized by multifamily properties.
Accurately review and ensure concise, complete, and transparent Investment Briefs and ensure accurate data quality for loan securitization.
Analyze and conclude on unique affordable housing pro forma property financial statement considerations, resolve transactional issues that escalate in third party report, work with Producers to structure deals, review borrower financial position, market analysis, property inspections, present deals for approval as needed.
Develop resolutions to problems of limited scope following specific and detailed procedures.

Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Real Estate, Finance, Economics, Business Administration, or related discipline or comparable amount of directly relevant professional experience.
Typically has 4 to 5 years of related experience, preferably in multifamily or commercial real estate finance.
Demonstrated proficiency with Microsoft Excel and Word.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Position requires travel (post Covid).

Keys to Success in this Role:
Strong interest in a commercial real estate career
Excellent collaborator and fantastic teammate
Sense of humor
Strong work ethic
Positive attitude
Great multitasker
Keep calm under pressure
Stay current on policies and regulations that may affect the industry and be comfortable with transition and change

Current Freddie Mac employees please apply through the internal career site.

Today, Freddie Mac makes home possible for one in four home borrowers and is one of the largest sources of financing for multifamily housing. Join our smart, creative and dedicated team and you’ll do important work for the housing finance system and make a difference in the lives of others.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. We will ensure that individuals with differing abilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.

Notice to External Search Firms: Freddie Mac partners with BountyJobs for contingency search business through outside firms. Resumes received outside the BountyJobs system will be considered unsolicited and Freddie Mac will not be obligated to pay a placement fee. If interested in learning more, please visit www.BountyJobs.com and register with our referral code: MAC.

Time-type: Full time

Job Category: Underwriting

FLSA Status: Exempt"
397,397,San+Jose,underwriter,"Commercial Underwriter
Position Overview
The Commercial Banking Underwriting Program provides a structured learning opportunity for individuals (Underwriters) to learn and develop technical underwriting skills. Underwriters participate in an approximately 18 - 24-month training program, including orientation, formal underwriting training, and a formal mentorship with an Underwriting Officer. Underwriters complete evaluation and documentation of the loan requests for assigned LOBs (Lines of Business); own deal analyses and execute workflow according to established SLAs (Service Level Agreements). Underwriters assist in the on-going monitoring of the credit exposure for assigned relationships, including renewals, reaffirmations and annual risk ratings.

Position Responsibilities:
Credit
Acquires technical skills through structured curriculum and apply knowledge and skills to on-the-job assignments.
Provides complete analysis of loan package for new deals, as well as reviews of existing relationships, utilizing the various underwriting methods as established by Credit Administration.
Prepares list of questions and summary of outstanding issues when underwriting loan requests with Underwriting Officer or Manager guidance.
Prepares loan packages; writes Officer and/or Credit comments with assistance from Relationship Manager (RM) or Portfolio Manager (PM); and provides complete credit documentation of the loan application by utilizing loan approval documents and other various addendums as established by Credit Administration.
Applies appropriate loan structures; prepares collateral charts, cash flows, risk ratings, and other pertinent attachments.
Provides industry analysis, spreads financial statements, and identifies and analyzes inconsistencies and inaccuracies within the customer provided financial statements.
Evaluates strengths and weaknesses of the credit and escalate risks and other issues; where appropriate while assisting the RM/PM with contacting customers to obtain answers for loan analyses. These responsibilities are to be completed with Underwriting Officer or Manager guidance.
Meets the service level agreements for volumes, accuracy, and timeliness. Minimizes errors and reword situations.
Understands and applies relevant credit policies to the underwriting process.
If applicable, recommend effective loan covenants to monitor financial performance and regularly calculate covenant package to ensure compliance.
Accurately completes risk ratings.
Administration
Where applicable, monitors loan covenants and tracking in conjunction with the Credit support team for assigned relationships.
Shares responsibility with Credit Support Specialists for performing OFAC checks and identifying issues.
Investigates title searches, surveys and UCC (Uniform Commercial Code) searches as requested by Manager, Underwriting Officer, or RM/PM.
Comply with regulatory requirements; Complete and apply required credit, regulatory, system, and process training.
Process Sustainability
Adhere to department procedures for workload management and strives to meet or exceed SLA and when not feasible, communicates to Manager and RM/PM.
Ensures appropriate loan approval document formats/attachments are used in accordance with approved process & procedures.
Other duties as assigned

Position Qualifications:

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree
Two (2) Accounting courses (minimum 6 units)
1 year of experience in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Business, Economics or similar degree field.
Minimum two Accounting courses (6 units).
Overall GPA of 3.0 and 3.0 GPA in two Accounting courses.
1 year of experience in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook
Demonstrated leadership and strong verbal and written communication skills
San Jose Main
8:00am - 5:00pm Monday - Friday"
398,398,San+Jose,underwriter,"Commercial Underwriter
Position Overview
The Commercial Banking Underwriting Program provides a structured learning opportunity for individuals (Underwriters) to learn and develop technical underwriting skills. Underwriters participate in an approximately 18 - 24-month training program, including orientation, formal underwriting training, and a formal mentorship with an Underwriting Officer. Underwriters complete evaluation and documentation of the loan requests for assigned LOBs (Lines of Business); own deal analyses and execute workflow according to established SLAs (Service Level Agreements). Underwriters assist in the on-going monitoring of the credit exposure for assigned relationships, including renewals, reaffirmations and annual risk ratings.

Position Responsibilities:
Credit
Acquires technical skills through structured curriculum and apply knowledge and skills to on-the-job assignments.
Provides complete analysis of loan package for new deals, as well as reviews of existing relationships, utilizing the various underwriting methods as established by Credit Administration.
Prepares list of questions and summary of outstanding issues when underwriting loan requests with Underwriting Officer or Manager guidance.
Prepares loan packages; writes Officer and/or Credit comments with assistance from Relationship Manager (RM) or Portfolio Manager (PM); and provides complete credit documentation of the loan application by utilizing loan approval documents and other various addendums as established by Credit Administration.
Applies appropriate loan structures; prepares collateral charts, cash flows, risk ratings, and other pertinent attachments.
Provides industry analysis, spreads financial statements, and identifies and analyzes inconsistencies and inaccuracies within the customer provided financial statements.
Evaluates strengths and weaknesses of the credit and escalate risks and other issues; where appropriate while assisting the RM/PM with contacting customers to obtain answers for loan analyses. These responsibilities are to be completed with Underwriting Officer or Manager guidance.
Meets the service level agreements for volumes, accuracy, and timeliness. Minimizes errors and reword situations.
Understands and applies relevant credit policies to the underwriting process.
If applicable, recommend effective loan covenants to monitor financial performance and regularly calculate covenant package to ensure compliance.
Accurately completes risk ratings.
Administration
Where applicable, monitors loan covenants and tracking in conjunction with the Credit support team for assigned relationships.
Shares responsibility with Credit Support Specialists for performing OFAC checks and identifying issues.
Investigates title searches, surveys and UCC (Uniform Commercial Code) searches as requested by Manager, Underwriting Officer, or RM/PM.
Comply with regulatory requirements; Complete and apply required credit, regulatory, system, and process training.
Process Sustainability
Adhere to department procedures for workload management and strives to meet or exceed SLA and when not feasible, communicates to Manager and RM/PM.
Ensures appropriate loan approval document formats/attachments are used in accordance with approved process & procedures.
Other duties as assigned

Position Qualifications:

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree
Two (2) Accounting courses (minimum 6 units)
1 year of experience in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Business, Economics or similar degree field.
Minimum two Accounting courses (6 units).
Overall GPA of 3.0 and 3.0 GPA in two Accounting courses.
1 year of experience in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook
Demonstrated leadership and strong verbal and written communication skills
San Jose Main
8:00am - 5:00pm Monday - Friday"
399,399,San+Jose,underwriter,"At Liberty Mutual, our purpose is to help people embrace today and confidently pursue tomorrow. That's why we provide an environment focused on openness, inclusion, trust and respect. Here, you'll discover our expansive range of roles, and a workplace where we aim to help turn your passion into a rewarding profession.
Liberty Mutual has proudly been recognized as a “Great Place to Work” by Great Place to Work® US for the past several years. We were also selected as one of the “100 Best Places to Work in IT” on IDG's Insider Pro and Computerworld's 2020 list. For many years running, we have been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Employers for Women and one of America's Best Employers for New Graduates—as well as one of America's Best Employers for Diversity. To learn more about our commitment to diversity and inclusion please visit: https://jobs.libertymutualgroup.com/diversity-inclusion
We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to make things better, and we put people first by offering you benefits that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/Benefits
Liberty Mutual is an equal opportunity employer. We will not tolerate discrimination on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, age, disability, veteran's status, pregnancy, genetic information or on any basis prohibited by federal, state or local law.
Depending on experience this position can be hired at various Underwriting levels.
This position can be located anywhere in the State of California.
Are you looking for an Underwriting opportunity with a responsible company that has consistently outpaced the industry in year over year growth? If so, we have an excellent underwriting opportunity available for you.
As a Senior Underwriter - Custom, you will ensure a profitable book of Property and Casualty insurance business by appropriately evaluating the acceptability of risks within delegated authority levels. You will partner with agents to lead and grow a multi-line book of business by evaluating, selecting, and pricing risks primarily $25,000 and greater. You will support marketing activities to agents and take part in the agency management process. The Senior Underwriter is also responsible for working with and protecting confidential and proprietary customer and Company information.
You will:
Evaluate the business applying for insurance by qualifying accounts; identifying, selecting and assessing risks.
Decide premium, policy terms and conditions; obtaining approvals; creating/presenting the proposal to the agent/broker and successfully negotiating deals.
Support and preserve successful relationships with Agents and Brokers by providing stewardship with service partners, including initial setup of service dedications, and regular visits.
Lead a book of business by analyzing the portfolio, identifying areas of opportunity for improved growth, profit and diversification, and executing marketing plans to increase market share with preferred brokers.
Document files in a way that reflects a firm thought process and decision-making through comprehensive account reviews, sign-offs and referrals.
Actively participate in continuous improvement by fully engaging in daily huddles, generating suggestions, following appropriate procedures and work principles, participating in problem solving activities, and using continuous improvement tools to support the work of the team.
Bachelor's degree or equivalent preferred, continuing insurance education desired.
Individual passionate about success with 5 plus years of success in a commercial underwriting role.
Ability to analyze variables, such as type & amount of coverage, loss control, credit reports, and loss experience.
Thorough knowledge of commercial insurance coverages, contracts & underwriting guidelines.
Formally and informally guide, mentor, and coach underwriters in both technical and professional skills.
Ability to interact successfully with customers to build & maintain good business relationships. Negotiation and pricing skills. Hard work, honesty, integrity and unwavering business ethics.

Bachelor's Degree

15"
401,401,San+Jose,underwriter,"JOB CAN BE PERFORMED REMOTELYResponsible for preparing Credit Authorizations (CA’s) to be presented for approval to the Credit Administrator and/or the Chief Credit Officer (CCO) and/or Loan Committee on new loans, renewals and modifications .QUALIFICATIONSBachelors Degree in Math, Business or related field, preferred.Knowledge of banking and lending operations and procedures, and the various regulations and standard banking practices.Minimum of 7 years of experience in the lending area of a financial institution. (Ideally 10 +)Job Type: Full-timePay: $100,000.00 - $110,000.00 per yearSchedule:Monday to Friday"
458,458,San+Jose,underwriter,"SUMMARY
The Mortgage Loan Underwriter is responsible for performing diversified duties related to the review and underwriting of Real Estate loan requests to include accurate analysis of related data derived from various sources while adhering to established guidelines and procedures.

QUALIFICATIONS
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Education and/or Experience. High school graduate and range of 3-5 years related recent work experience underwriting conventional mortgage loan requests with a direct lender and/or mortgage insurance company. Thorough working knowledge of Fannie Mae guidelines is essential.Certificates, Licenses, Registrations. None required.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONSUnderwriting real estate (1st to include streamline refi and 2nd lien position) loan applications according to Credit Union and secondary marketing lending standards.Accurately reviewing and approving all required loan documentation to satisfy underwriting findings and ensuring documentation meets secondary market requirements. Various file components including AUS/DU reports, title reports, appraisals, credit reports, condition items and supporting documentation to include various types of income sources ie: salaried, self-employed, rental income, corporate and partnership tax returns, etc.Ensuring loan approvals adhere to property type, occupancy, loan to value and loan amount guidelines established by the Credit Union.Understanding the levels of risk associated with mortgage loans, and ability to recommend a restructure of loan request as needed to reduce risk to the Credit Union.
Rendering credit decisions in a fair and impartial manner to the best of his or her ability.Maintaining strong working knowledge of current investor underwriting requirements (ie: FNMA, mortgage insurance company).Managing pipeline to meet turn time requirements and achieve individual and department real estate production goals as outlined by the Credit Union.
Lending support to all organizational departments in complying with federal fair lending and equal opportunity laws and regulations.Processing, analyzing, and completing internal/external lender subordination requests.Processing Loan Officer application/loan withdrawal requests in a timely manner.Other related duties as needed and/or assigned.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES
Strong verbal and written communication skills with demonstrated ability to communicate professionally at all levels.Effective interpersonal skills and ability to work with all levels of staff in a professional, approachable, and positive manner.Forward-thinking.Ability to handle simultaneously, multiple tasks and changing priorities in an efficient and effective manner.Ability to maintain strict confidentiality.Ability to conduct thorough research; interpret and understand laws and regulations and provide workable recommendations and solutions to problems.Broad knowledge of, and practical experience with operations functions, products and services and the laws and regulations which affect the Credit Union.Detail-oriented, self-starter who can work independently.Maintains thorough and current knowledge of all federal, state, and local regulations as well as internal Credit Union policies, procedures, products, and services.Computer literate and proficient in software applications to include LOS, online research tools and MS Office: Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and OutlookHungry: Always looking for more. More things to do. More to learn. More responsibility to take on. Self-motivated and diligent. Constantly thinking about the next step and the next opportunity.Humble: Lack excessive ego or concerns about status. Quick to point out the contributions of others and slow to seek attention for self. Shares credit, emphasize team over self and define success collectively rather than individually.Smart: Have common sense about people. Tend to know what is happening in a group situation and how to deal with others in the most effective way. Demonstrates good judgment and intuition around the subtleties of group dynamics and the impact of their words and actions.

PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. This position is in an office environment with quiet to moderate noise levels.

Full-time hours required, with additional work hours as necessary to accomplish objectives, goals, and projects.Occasionally lift and/or move up to 10 pounds.
EEO STATEMENT
SCCFCU does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex, national origin, age, disability, marital status, pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding or related condition, ancestry, medical condition including genetic characteristics, veteran or military status, sexual orientation, gender expression, any persons holding an undocumented “AB” 60” driver’s license, or any other characteristic protected by law. This provision also includes the perception that anyone has any of the above characteristics or is associated with a person who has or is perceived as having any one of these characteristics. All such discrimination is unlawful.

This job description is not an exclusive or exhaustive list of all job functions that an employee in this position may be asked to perform from time to time. Santa Clara County Federal Credit Union reserves the right to revise or change job duties and responsibilities as the need arises."
460,460,San+Jose,underwriter,"We are looking for Jumbo Underwriters! Jumbo/Non-Agency Underwriter role analyzes the risk and compliance of residential mortgage loan applications within the scope of private investor and company guidelines. This role is responsible for minimizing the risk exposure of the organization by certifying applications are underwritten to the applicable parameters.Jumbo Underwriter Requirements: Completing a thorough analysis of loan applications to determine compliance with company and investor guidelines and subsequently issuing compliant loan decisions on each applicationSubmit non-delegated loans to the applicable investorSubsequent review of resubmitted loan applications to analyze requested documents necessary to issue a final loan decision.Coaching and mentoring the Loan Processing staff on underwriting related guidelines and scenarios.Responding to loan audits and post-closing request for additional documentation in a timely manner.Completing self-provisioned and assigned training and research to maintain a current working knowledge of investor guidelines and policies.Other duties as assigned by Supervisor or ManagerCompleting self-provisioned and assigned training and research to maintain a current working knowledge of agency and investor guidelines and policies.Jumbo Underwriter Minimum Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalent.Seven-ten (7-10) prior experience underwriting credit and collateral to Agency, FHA, Jumbo Agency/ Non-QM Loans, VA, USDA guidelines.Prior experience underwriting non-conforming (JUMBO) loan applications to private investor standards required.Job Type: Full-timePay: $100,000.00 - $115,000.00 per yearBenefits:401(k)Dental insuranceHealth insurancePaid time offVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayExperience:Jumbo Underwriting: 5 years (Preferred)Work Location:Multiple locationsWork Remotely:Yes"
